Africans in the rest of Africa view the ANC as traitors. In their view the ANC betrayed Africa by not getting rid of the whites. They want Africa for Africans only.
Lastly, when I made this salad I followed the directions under the NOTE area.
The seared meat medallion was accompanied by fried mushroom and some sort of radish - while the crispy rice balls make a cameo as well. I've never tasted mushroom charred to this degree yet completely juicy in the center and not powdery even in the blackened bits. A lovely course.
Still, I will never mock the acting powers of Jared Leto or Marlon Wayans again. Wayans is revelatory, although I have only ever seen the most obnoxious of his works (the admittedly enjoyable Scary Movie, the shit Little Man and White Chicks). His Tyrone is a completely serious character, and Wayans works it very well. Jared Leto is good as Harry. '30 Seconds To Mars' are still shit, but I'm less inclined to sneer at his acting output in future. Jennifer Connelly is as great as ever as Harry's girlfriend, Marion. But the most tragic of the stories is that of Sara (Burstyn) who becomes addicted to a mix of weight loss pills, antidepressants and an overriding desire to be on TV. A TV which Harry keeps stealing. Whilst the Harry, Tyrone and Marion storyline is very much 'drugs are bad' infomercial material, Sara's is simply horrific.
Watching over me
It's all over Pinterest.
Rea: Your first relationships are often the most intense and impressionable of your life. You’re not yet bombarded with paying bills or having a steady job – you can enjoy each other – you can focus on your feelings and not much else. As we grow older, this is what we often lose sight of: each other. This book reminds you of what’s important at any stage in relationships – focusing on what you appreciate about the person, not what annoys you.
Above all, I hope that you're still there, confident, beautiful and welcoming.
For the pillars of the temple stand apart.
tea’s aftertaste
So if you’re feeling daring, I highly recommend these brownies. They’re a delicious, deep-flavored treat that just so happens to have some beans mixed in.
without the appearance of tear ducts
813 D-V/4/1981. “Norman Belgrade (1914-1981).” Funeral Service, Sholem Memorial Park Cemetery, Skokie, Illinois. See Item D-V/11/1996, below.
For ages two to four,
Parrish
Basically, what I need is a creative and techy person who can convert the whole thing into something I can easily access and update (Wordpress?). I can't afford to pay someone, but a thought has occurred to me. (It happens, occasionally.) What if you have those skills and you're also a writer? Maybe you would like a critique, but can't afford one. Or perhaps you've just never got round to organising this kind of feedback. Would you be interested in doing the necessary on my website in exchange for me editing your MS? You can see a bit about my editing services here.
B3 - The Great Outdoors
snuggle back into my pillow
The sign is a palimpsest, but the key message can still be deciphered: 'Sécurité sobriété' (safety and sobriety). This anti-drinking campaign began on Parisian public transport in 1955. Within a few years, it spread throughout France and the roadside signs emphasised the dangers of drink-driving.
By the end of the lesson, we had revised the personality adjectives a lot, but the students were still struggling with these questions, and especially how to answer them – they tried to start every answer with ‘He likes…’ regardless of which question it was.
- 75 g sour cream
Now, I could come back after that, but I've tried that before and I had the hardest time roping people into reading this blog again. Why do you write posts? I write them to have conversations. I love your comments. I have thoroughly enjoyed the friendships formed through blogging. But you can't have a conversation with one person. (Well, you can, but it's just not that fun for me. :P) So in light of this, I've decided to put this blog on the back burner. No, not that back burner. The one CLEAR over there. Further back. Further.... A little further still. There you go!
I just don't get it...
The initial driver for fortnightly collections of residual waste, such as that placed in green bins in Amber Valley, was an apparent shortage of landfill sites to bury waste. However, a reduction in costs for the collecting authority is also a major factor in the decision to reduce collection frequency. It is also obvious that reducing residual waste capacity forces many households to recycle more of their waste.
Many moons ago, I was playing trumpet in an orchestra that met on the weekends. This group was comprised of kids from all the schools around the region and had to compete to be included. This was a higher quality of player than the average high school band as a result and when the level of ability increased accordingly, one could then compete for the advanced orchestra. The leader of this group had been there as many moons ago as I am speaking of having been there – as there seemed to be no beginning to his presence. He was a rather loud individual who had practiced on voice volume to compete with an orchestra of 60 kids. (Side note: I can only imagine his own kids reaction to that voice.) Anyways, he would threaten to utilize a sacrificial lamb in the orchestra considering that even though we were better in regards to the high schools, we were still teenagers. He had this speech set up and probably well practiced over the years about how someone would be the sacrificial lamb to be ousted for behavior such that the remaining individual would learn to behave better.
“Su… I’m sorry for treating you like this but I have no choice. You keep trying to suicide. I can’t let it happen.”
Salt – 1/2 teaspoon or adjusted to taste
The cadets say they have been verbally abused and spat at while walking to training sessions near Blues’ St Andrews stadium in Bordesley, Birmingham.
Anyway, it's a little sad to know that many girls/people here (and in other places) wish that they were lighter. I guess from where I'm standing, I think all different skin types are beautiful. I may go on and on about how gorgeous people are in India and Nicaragua and places like that, but that doesn't mean that I necessarily wish I looked like them. I'm fine with my skin color and it's sad that some people aren't.
I have noticed that when posting photos onto my blog they are now in the right order instead of being reversed. No longer will I have to chant my mantra: 'The first will be last and the last will be first'!!
Just need to find a way to display it - I could pop it in a frame but would like to do something more imaginative. Any ideas?
One Year Ago Today
Haven't worked out the details yet of kids, dog, hubbie, school, Saturday sports.... But you know what? I believe in deciding on the goal and the rest will work out. What do you think? Have an idea of where you want to be and how to get there will just happen.
Then there are fun photos of wildlife doing things that you don’t see everyday, like geese on the roof of an apartment building. I knew that those photos weren’t going to fit my quest for the perfect photo of a goose, but I took them anyway because they tell a story.
As for “the best girl”? Ehh. I’m by no means an expert at this show, but if I had to spin up an official Delta PowerRanking, it would be:
So when I’m back to being emotionally stable, I’m sure we will have the talk. Putting my body through IVF was intense and not fun, but I also chose it. So if he’s gonna decide to fix the hose, then I want it to be his choice.
“Reading again? You are so lovely up there!”
-Megan
Sometimes when we touch…Dan Hill
Got a feeling this Walker book may now be out of print but it is definitely worth hunting down in your local second hand bookshops.The illustrations are stunning.
7.elle decor
Talking of food, it was time for lunch and as the Rajdoot Indian Restaurant was to hand, we decided to give it a try. We usually choose a vegetable thali, if there is one on the menu, but as there wasn’t, we chose a combination of side dishes with lassi to drink. We were the only customers (a lot of restaurants here open only in the evening) so we were served with great attention and enjoyed leisurely conversation with the manager and waiters.
Please know that it was always my intention to do an honest job for the authors that I worked with. I know how much your hard work means to you. I also know how hard you worked for the money that you invested to receive publishing and promotional services that you expected to be provided—especially when I promised you that the work you paid for would be done. At the time I sold you these services, I truly believed that you were paying for legitimate services that were being provided by the owners of the company. When I realized this wasn’t the case, I made the decision to leave.
LET THE BLACK DRY!
OH STICKERS! i love stickers on manis. but there are none around here at the dollar store and they cheapest i can find is $4-$5 for 1 or 2 sheets. I GOT 50 HERE! for $1 something! i could not be more ecstatic! and theres black ones and white ones and colored ones!
Of utensil stealing, rhythmic as a cantor
The closet is freshly painted and we're ready to put in the first drawer. (Note to self: Repainting always takes AT LEAST two coats...Never think you can get away with one.)
the other children around him.
With these celebrity endorsements it became apparent that the straw poll would have greater participation than I anticipated. And the final results were informative:
And, who could forget the "S.W.A.T Team style" raid (complete with Blackhawk helicopters!) on Louisiana "pit bull" breeder, Floyd Boudreaux? Another case of all dogs dead, due process rights thrown out the window, and THOUSANDS of dollars wasted. The outcome? The judge threw out the case.
Yes, this week’s Weigh-In Wednesday is on Thursday, but since it’s summer, I figure I can bend the rules like that once in a while. I am so glad that I postponed the weigh-in, because this morning the scale reflected what it’s been showing me all week:
I'm back to homebrewing again, after a 3-month hiatus. I haven't brewed since early June! I brew outside, and we've had a very hot & humid Summer which was more conducive to passing-out from heat exhaustion, rather than brewing. The weather yesterday (on the Labor Day holiday) was perfect...80F was the hottest temp observed. I would have brewed on Sunday, also, but my back and left hamstring were injured severely on my last big running event. A few days ago, I couldn't even tie my own shoes, let alone do any of the tasks involved with homebrewing. (I'm much better, now).
AWP: In addition to being students of French history and culture, literature and politics; what French cultural nuances, attitudes, ideas, or habits were adopted by Bouvier, Sontag and Davis? In which areas have you embraced a similar aesthetic?
Wrap the loaf in heavy duty tin foil, or a double layer of regular tin foil. Place wrapped loaf on your oven rack that is placed in the middle of the oven. Bake for 20 minutes, or until the cheese is all melty and gooey.
R11- (sc dec) around (6).
18 Magic Bus (7:00)
Hide yourself, O my Beloved!
You can use it with all kind of flower displays - here below it is used with
I can’t imagine these things, yet there they are. Some level of imagination is required to conceive of these types of projects as being beneficial, and what is required in response is a greater imagination for the good. I believe we have the means now for a global responsibility wake-up call, convened primarily through social media. In fact it has probably already begun.
But I fear the wrath of Bane
"Maybe theme is something to consider if you're writing 'literary' work, but I write genre."
Serve as snacks with your choice of sauces..
The next day, we drove towards our next stop, Hot Springs, Arkansas. I’d always wanted to go and heard about the wonderful therapeutic hot baths they have with all the natural hot spring water – I’m always looking for relief from the nagging pain in my ankle from an old skateboard injury. On our drive up, it started raining cats & dogs but soon, the intense weather passed. Later that evening, when we had checked into the Hot Springs KOA, #1 son called to warn us about the tornadoes that had pummelled parts of Dallas – I told him we were okay – we were spared! Annie & I had two very relaxing nights in Hot Springs. The only noise I heard was the wind and birds singing in the morning. My friend Mike asked me to bring him home a piece of crystal – I didn’t know but the crystals are a by-product of the hot springs. We went to a place called Coleman’s Rocks & Gems and picked up some very cool crystal rock formations. In the beginning, I thought Hot Springs was a National Park like Yosemite but it’s not like that – the whole area was designated as a NP. We walked downtown and stopped in the historic Arlington Hotel, once frequented by gangsters, celebrities, and baseball teams (many teams had Spring training in Hot Springs). We enjoyed a couple nice meals, including a famous BBQ joint called McClard’s – had a very nice broasted chicken with their signature cole slaw and fries. We slept good and the setting at the KOA was quiet with lots of singing birds to calm my nerves.
I Could sleep near a creek.
We have also opened up our new (second) business, so between family, flying visits to OZ, the new house and the new business i can honestly say i haven't crafted at all in the 3 months. Oh i have attended a extravaganza and one class, but to me that does not count, as it was all someone else's work(design) not my own.
Scott Rennie, DO
In the early 2000s Moe served as democratic South Africa's ambassador to Algeria.
Did anybody find out about the trip in advance?
at every meeting or party, they seem to match and rid of their differences
I’m sure they would have preferred to remain Republicans, but in the current climate, the extreme right wing of the party is targeting anyone who doesn’t meet its strict criteria. Its new and narrow litmus test for party membership doesn’t allow compromise.
この記事に掲載した写真は、ロックポートというメキシコ湾沿いのテキサスの街で滞在した時のものです。子供達を連れて海岸に行き、砂のお城（のつもり）を作ったり、海に浸かったり、日光浴したりしました。長女はずっと水の中で遊んでいられる、魚のような子なのに対し、次女はトカゲのように太陽の下で暖まっている方が好きです。砂のお城を作り終えた後、夫と長女は泳ぎに水に入ったのですが、次女は砂のところでゴールドフィッシュというお魚の形をしたクラッカーのおやつを食べる事にしたようです。私も少し水に浸かりに行きました。
The technician shuttled the recording backward and zoomed slight outward. He forwarded to the blurred movement on the screen. He slowed it down. On the lowest tier of the station something stirred, then disappeared into the deeper depths of the ice mountain, retreating beyond the reach of sonar. Though visible only for a moment, there was no doubt. Amanda whispered, “Something’s alive in there…”
That tricky word's Iclandic, meaning 'small goods' so they say,
The Society for the Protection of Nature in Israel (SPNI) marked the Jesus Trail. “Marking the trail serves both to improve accessibility to hikers and also to limit environmental impact to one path,” said Gili Greenbaum, Marking Coordinator for SPNI.
2- Frida have a girlfriend…when she actually been attracted to Mia…Mia take a first step lo..she’s the one that kiss Frida first…huhu..
Here are the arm pieces for my shyvana cosplay. I was not able to finish the right arm piece completely. It took me longer than I expected, so you’ll be seeing it partly finished. I will update my post when it is completely done, but for now only the left arm is complete. The right arm still needs some more mache and sanding. I thought the head piece would be harder than the arm pieces but I guess I was wrong -_-.
In inches, in miles, in laughter, in strife.
The most exciting moment for me was when Barry Cunningham called me at home to say my book had been shortlisted in the Times/ChickenHouse competition. It was like a dream come true – I was literally shaking all over. The second I put the phone down I rang my mum and just screamed like some sort of half-crazed lunatic.
I printed 20 of these pages at my local print shop and then trimmed them all to size. I also cut a piece of cardboard (cereal box, extra packaging, whatever) in the same size for the back. Then stack them all together getting the top as even as possible.
the poor, and the prostitutes;
Hits
Roll & Cover Games - These games promote counting and one-to-one correspondence. The kids roll a die and then add that number of objects to their board. The first person to fill their board wins. I have created many of these, which I will be posting separately.
12. Stars
Remain the same?
1251 U.S. 31 North, Greenwood
What steps do you need to take as you initiate change?
They moved the tent. My brother handed the ashes to the worker who stood in the hole. He placed the box inside a steel box in the ground. Then they asked if we had anything else to place in the box with her. We didn’t know we could do that. No one told us and I didn’t think to ask. I had never done this before. But nephew’s mom had the bouquet which she was pleased to put in the box. I put in a red rose as did my sister-in-law. That was it. We didn’t know what else to do.
I was a shy child. I loved primary school but found secondary school really painful. I mostly got the bus to the school gates, turned around and went back home again. My mum was cool with this, though it meant I have some big gaps in my understanding of maths and I have pretty terrible memory for general knowledge. My most favourite subject has always been anything to do with people, I’ve always wanted to know what makes us tick.
We went to the club with some of MOH’s clients for dinner. The club is a lovely place. It looks like part of a motel. There were all these fancy things on the menu to eat, I should have thought about what I could eat so that I could eat quickly and gracefully. I was so intent on NOT embarrassing MOH with my ‘Food shoveling habits’, which have been acquired while waiting on children who eat much quicker than me, that I don’t eat a third of my order, because I was so desperately trying not to make a mess of myself. I ordered angel hair, not a good choice for trying to eat gracefully. I should have ordered the chicken, I would have been terrifically happy with the chicken, but I never make myself seafood anymore because Daughter #1 is allergic to shrimp, so I don’t bring it into the house to make it for myself. I ordered the seafood dinner because MOH was so excited about it, and I was SO out-of-place that I couldn’t think straight. I’m not like a, “What will they think of me?” kind of person. I’m more concerned that they will think poorly of MOH for having a complete baboon who can’t carry conversation for a wife. My kids were all freaked out because I actually wore make up and jewelry. At one point in the conversation, there was discussion of a new resteraunt in town. Of course, I was the ONLY one at the table who had never been there. Even MOH had eaten there with a client. MOH said, “You have to excuse her she doesn’t get out much.” To which I replied, “I get out, just not to the same places you all would go.” (Talk about adding to the self-consciousness. Thanks love. Again, not one of his shining moments of brilliance, but forgivable.) This after I launched my fork onto the ground, how I may never know, and the matron of the party fetched another from the table across from us for me. (I must have turned Coke can red.)
Last weekend I was challenged to think about what I’m passionate about. I attended a writer’s workshop in Denver to learn more about the possibility of publishing a book on conscious creation. During that seminar, I experienced an extreme range of emotion. First I was elated, filled with inspiration and creativity and dreams of the New York Times bestseller list in my mind. The next day, reality set in when I learned how difficult publishing can be, how rare it is to succeed in the industry and how much time needs to be devoted to not just writing a book but promoting it as well.
About 334 Taser-related deaths have been reported between 2001 and 2008, according to Amnesty International.
IN Canada, Chinese clients at a bank may receive assistance from an officer who speaks either Guang dong hua (Cantonese) or Guo yu (Mandarin). An American company, Rosetta Stone, marketing a computerised language program runs a TV ad that has a Caucasian at the end saying: “Xian zai wo wei shuo Guo yu” (“Now I can speak Mandarin”).
Gimmicks, fads and entertainment in men’s ministry appeal to some men’s desire to remain in adolescence, but they will not produce disciples of Jesus Christ.
I looked down at my dog, now licking my toes sticking out of the only pair of high-heeled sandals I owned. “No, I don’t, Betty. I know I’m good, but there are a lot of good musicians out there.” Now I was twirling the ends of my hair, but there was no way my mother or even myself would ever put it up into a chignon. It was stick straight, long—just past my shoulders, dark brown, and baby fine but silky, which is good, I suppose…the silky part, anyway. The closest I ever get to pinning my hair up is a ponytail. Everything else just slips through the hair ties.
07 Howie B.-Take Your Partner By The Hand (Red Snapper Remix)
Japanese law makes a nuclear operator fully liable for all the costs of a disaster, but in practice the Japanese people will end up paying almost all of the costs out of their taxes, not the nuclear industry.
* C# is heard in the bass, anyway, though Mayo Thompson does not play a straight C# major triad on the guitar on the last beat.
Once it was sanded I gave it a couple of coats of Wickes wood dye in a Medium Oak colour and left it for a further 2 days.
Making people feel like a child, and using words that depict them as children, has been a favorite way to demean and belittle people and show everyone that this group is below the normal “adult” parts of society. This immediately sets the stage for that group of the society to be treated below the other parts of society. When this happens, it becomes ok to mistreat, demean, destroy, and otherwise commit violence on this group because they are children who need to be put in their place.
Whenever His Majesty the bull importantly goes by
Atop the endplate is the revised vane and cascade arrangement. The vane is now more rectangular in appearance and serves both to direct airflow and meet the minimum side-elevation bodywork surface area for the endplate. To this are fitted two cascade elements, a larger two element winglet and the smaller single element winglet. These downforce producing sections also are angles to aid the general outswept airflow in this area.
The rules in Agile are deceptively simple. They are things like "iterations should be no more than 4 weeks" and "all iterations should be shippable." Following the rules mostly involves unlearning years of what you will later realize were bad habits.
The Salomonsson site also tells us that Chinese Whispers is the first in an Op Cop / Europol quartet, that it received the ’Best Swedish Crime Novel’ award in 2011, and was shortlisted for the ‘Best Crime Novel of the Year’ award by the Danish Academy of Crime Writers in 2012.
Bards Notes, Compass and Boat Quest 3
I really couldn't pull these colours together using paper/ink, soooo...
Don't even go there if you're on a diet. But this is a party!
in non- sentient towers.
OK, suppose I finish law school and now I have my law degree. I could waive into the patent bar, having already worked at the Office for at least 4 years, so I'd be free to leave (after working off the debt to the Office) and go work in private practice. Instead of sending out the rejections, I'd be writing the applications and sending in the amendments.
6 - 7 Curry Leaves
This is such a big deal as we are in the need of informational materials and other supplies for parents in our area with newly diagnosed designer gene babies.
Consider this my official call for help and input. So far, I have two artists on board. It’s a start. I’ll be talking with a reporter this week. Also, I wrote to the group in Utah that held a similar event this weekend.
Anyhow, if anybody who happens to be reading this post wants to learn how to use apostrophes properly there are sites which can help. Here are a few :-
This is actually my first year doing Script Frenzy, I entered last year but couldn’t make it because of school work, but now that I graduated I have all the time in the world.
This is really, really old cable. The cable we’ve used for, well, just about forever has rubber insulation, and this is clearly not rubber.
Pale/Amber Ales
Further, the lawyers from the lawyers movement, in the aftermath of their rule of law revolution, have recoiled. There is no mass drive in the lower judiciary to change the system so people have access to justice, just political intrigue in the higher echelons. Here and there, people will surface with small plans in good faith. But even the education of law does not allow the development of local doctrines or critical legal thought.
For the record, at this point let's see if we can't dig out the actual meaning of the term Mary-Sue. Because it did have a useful definition once, before it was co-opted and turned into a two-word mud-pie to diminish female characters. And that definition was this:
In my 2009 Brew Year Goals post, I explained that I wanted to try growing some hops this year. I have been doing some research and making a list of potential varieties based on my taste in beer. I was talking with SWMBO about which ones I should try. She asked how much they were. I told her I was looking at freshops.com who had them at $4.50 each. She thought for a moment and said, “Why don’t you just get them all?” Before she could change her mind, I had the order placed. That was March 1. They were shipped March 4 and arrived here March 6. Now they are in the refrigerator waiting for the risk of frost to pass.
Summer activities abound in Vancouver but this is a popular and enduring one that has brought many smiles to Vancouverites and visitors alike since 1940 and been a springboard for many a fine thespian.
Instead, I mostly watched movies and knit.
How did you hook up with Albini in the first place?
ARENA is about dancing to the sound of great djs producers in the most unique venues, gathering gay and lesbian house music lovers from Mexico and abroad
Just because its Wednesday....
You can add between 5 to 10 drops of essential oil to your homemade laundry detergent if you prefer your laundry soap scented (essential oil ideas: lavender, rosemary, tea tree oil). I really enjoy the clean smell of the fels naptha.
(Guards enter. They surround Anwaar, blocking the audience’s view.)
It's becoming a bit of a habit starting the week with some soul and like all habits it is becoming increasingly difficult to break. But when the tunes are as good as this they should I?
So, we have been talking about it for months, but wasn't sure what devise to get and then recently my friend Jennifer, told me that she downloaded an app from her iPhone! YES, there really is an APP for EVERYTHING!!!! And believe it or not, so far I have only downloaded the free "geocaching intro" app and have been perfectly happy with it!! Have I told you all how much I LOVE my iPhone??? I downloaded this app and it was ready to go within minutes!!!
It would be an illustration within an illustration!
BFI Documentary Section
And mostly they were happy.
"Look at us both, covered in other people's blood," Mitchell tells Lucy in the season finale, "But there's one difference between you and me: you had a choice." This is by no means the only occasion in the finale in which Mitchell permits himself to take the moral high ground with Lucy, whose experiments on werewolves led to the deaths of several people. Even though Mitchell's body count dwarfs hers, she eventually accepts his right to do so. Kemp, meanwhile, is simply a monster, ranting about fire and brimstone as he lusts after Lucy, and proclaiming his righteousness as he kills her, banishes Annie to purgatory, and is dragged bodily into hell. Mitchell, on the other hand, is allowed to return to the bosom of the family he's formed with George and his werewolf girlfriend Nina, who are willing to overlook his past crimes and remain ignorant of his more recent ones, brooding over his misdeeds without taking any steps to atone for them or ensure that they won't recur, and reclaiming his role as a romantic hero by vowing to rescue Annie from the underworld.
thanks for looking,
If I write about you maybe you’ll go away. I know your kind — I can smell you coming three days away. You’ve got the full moon written all over my face. Why don’t you get lost? Knock on someone else’s head.
I’m thinking of bringing with me two different camera backs at all times, one loaded with colour film and the other with black and white, so I have a choice and if there is not enough light, I can always shoot bw and push it.
For the whole of dinner, Jenny wouldn’t shut up about how I was being all weird and secretive and I was just waiting for Mum or Dad to tell me off for discluding her or something. But Dad just ruffled my hair as he took his plate into the kitchen and said, “Give him a break, Jen, he’s growing up.”
I thought that Fever had a much faster pace than Wither. There is never a dull moment as Rhine flits from one danger to the next in her quest to reach her home in Manhattan and reunite with her twin brother Rowan. I was on the edge of my seat the entire time and wasn’t sure what was worse living a lie as Linden’s wife? Or acting as Madams puppet in her Carnival? Both lifestyles are equally as shocking and horrendous and I love that about Lauren DeStefano’s books, how she doesn’t shy away from tough topics. Whereas in book one we got to look at life as a bride this book takes a look into life as a prostitute which was as equally harrowing yet fascinating to read about. Although controversial topics, I think they add an extra layer of horror to the books and because of that make this future in particular one of the bleakest and cruellest I’ve read in dystopian fiction.
Of course, there are some picture books published every year by children's imprints for which the audience is really adults. The ones who skate that line in an acceptable way are usually light-hearted life advice, like: "if you love someone, set them free." They are bought as graduation gifts (see Walk On or Oh The Places You'll Go). The ones that don't are usually dreadful and sometimes psychotic life advice, like: "if you love someone, let them chop you down to a stump."
I showcase the wonderful creations of many designers from around the world that fills me up with inspiration. I hope you also feel inspired each time you visit.
Don't forget about Fred. Here's a shot of him snuggling with me. My buddy.
Special Events Coordinator
back.
(from Brandon's letter)
Centre for Behavioural Research in Cancer. Paper 13: Adolescents’ reactions to cigarette packs modified to increase extent and impact of health warnings.
The short length makes them very easy to clean. Also, we
and all that’s left is he and I
I ran and ran and ran and waited and waited and waited for the vibration. All you Garmin users are asking yourself WHY I didn’t just look at my Garmin and see where the mileage was at, right? I know you are. It’s okay. I’m not offended. The fact is that I don’t like to watch the mileage tick off, which is one of the reasons I love the 610. I don’t have to! I can swipe my screen and have the time showing (or the virtual partner, which I have to figure out how to adjust because that dude runs at a 9:05 pace and I will never catch him). I prefer to have the clock face showing because it’s more important that I get back to my house by 5:30 than what pace or how far I’ve run.
Lift Your Head Up!
In the times of darkness, the Word speaks to me… what is my suffering compared to Paul’s? What is Paul’s suffering compared to that of the Lord’s? How small our problems are, and how big we always make them out to be…
There you go then. With under resourced and overworked armed forces our government is reserving the right to invade anywhere that they see fit to, “get the building blocks of security in place in all fragile countries”.
(mandatory)
After leaf of your mind’s music, page, walk leaf
Don't my pierogies look so yummy? Wait a minute... there isn't a picture! Aaaaahhhhhhh!!!! Seriously, I made them, took a picture (a pretty good picture, if you ask me!), and then proceeded to delete ALL the pictures from my camera. I thought I had transferred them all but it turns out I didn't. :( Bummer!
Shelter Cymru, the homelessness charity, and one of the giants of the third sector, is based in Swansea. (Its president-for-life, John Puzey, was also on television last week, calling for more affordable housing.) Also very active in the Swansea area is Cyrenians Cymru, who help 'rough sleepers' (I don't sleep too well sometimes - does that make me a rough sleeper?). There are other charities like the Salvation Army and various Christian bodies also active in the area, providing help for down-and-outs.
The Korean War was a seesaw conflict swinging back and forth between the UN forces and Communist that led to a stalemate early in the conflict that would largely remain for the remainder of the conflict.
Before you write your book title, make a list of all related keywords and perform a search on Google to see what comes up in the results. Also, when you do your search, the first page shown should have a short list of other suggested keywords or phrases (usually at the very top or bottom of the page). Incorporating as many of these words into your book title as is possible will help your book be seen better in the future.
Then along came Createspace.com. This site will allow me to get my book to market at no or little cost. Well, at least not in terms of money.
If you can imagine your muscular engagement as a dial, practice your engagement at different levels of engagement. Try about a 3, then dial it up to a 7; try a 10 (completely engaged) then dial your engagement back to a 1 or a 2. Practice these different levels to become familiar with the amount of effort it takes to engage. Why? Because you don't need to dial up your engagement to a 10 if you are only picking up a water bottle. But what if you are picking up a toddler or a heavy rock? Then you need more muscular engagement.
Lovely. Just what I need, Type 2 diabetes.
There are a few items that you can always count on me being stocked up on. Pasta and chicken just happen to be two of those items. I threw this recipe together after seeing a similar recipe on allrecipes.com. It was surprisingly good, both Daniel and I had seconds. I've never used pesto before and after a mis-communication between Daniel and I last fall, he brought me home three jars of the stuff. I requested three jars of brushcetta, still not sure why he then brought home pesto but all is good. I contemplated adding some cream cheese to the pesto sauce, but I was afraid it wouldn't turn out so I left it out. If someone is brave enough to add the cream cheese please let me know how it turns out!
Have you taken an idea lately and changed it up a bit to fit you?
Another thing I have heard lately from Randy is “Don’t believe the lie”. Whatever that lie is that we believe that keeps us trapped. Embrace the truth. Don’t believe the lie.
With the focus on “fun” there was an early confusion that quickly settled into a “this is why we play this sport” kind of feeling. I’m sure that every player on STRD would agree that despite what the score read it was not at all an easy victory. Every point was worked for as KRR always fight to the very last whistle. In contrast to the last game against Hamburg we wanted to get everything out of every jam that we could. Our “goating” was exceptional, whereas against Hamburg we gave them no rest from speed. STRD even performed its first in game “amoeba” to the delight of the crowd who were in full force to cheer on their team.
Revolution 2020:
Emily Fay I am linking up at:
Melanie - Center Of The Circle
WENT out to the hazel wood,
MULTICAT: a multiplicity of cats, all in the same place together. (Six Degrees of Separation, The Italian Job, Let the Right One In, Hellboy, L'Atalante)
However, 2 of the days since I started the new size pages, I only got about one and two thirds of a page done. This is roughly equivalent of 2.5 – 3 pages in my old pad. I wasn’t slacking, I just ran out of time. So I’m going to count them as done anyway. I did the work.
Who, with a sane mind, would celebrate losing one year of their lives? Send greeting cards to loved ones, party, and give presents? The only possible explanation is, that it's purely commercial.
So I carefully slid onto the vinyl seat of the telephone stand and gently lifted the receiver to my ear. I expected to hear the voice of one of Mom’s friends. But I didn’t recognize the voice at all.
Add the tofu, chocolate mixture, and agave nectar to a food processor. Blend until smooth, about 1 minute. Pour the mixture into the pie crust and refrigerate for 1.5 hours or until set.
Six months ago, Angela fell pregnant. I asked if she would be paid maternity benefit. She said Pecksniff had said no. I asked if Pecksniff was contributing to UIF (unemployment insurance fund) on Angela’s behalf (legally all employers and employees earning below a certain amount must contribute to UIF). Angela wasn’t sure. If Pecksniff and Angela contribute to UIF then she is able to register for a maternity benefit from the state. Do bear in mind Pecksniff’s words in her letter pertaining to price increases.
He grimaced, tossed his tie over his shoulder, and said to me, "they grade us for looking professional. But this keeps happening to my ties!"
I’d changed into my flowered PJs and my fluffy white potato-sack robe. We cuddled together on the big couch, but I was getting sleepy and didn’t want to accidently fall asleep with him. They’d kill us both. So, I moved over to my little couch. Mr. T followed after a second.
A battle for my sanity. A battle that felt like the hordes of hell itself had pitted itself agin me.
Both metaphors and similes are wonderful things in fiction--they allow us to manipulate words and make them into pictures. They make our stories visual, which means we're engaging multiple senses and the more senses you can engage, the more real your story feels. So, we shall all agree that metaphors and similes are wonderful things.
Now I know how much you would like to copy me and my style sense but you will just have to envy me for now in my awesomeness while wearing these amazing boots!!! Just be content that you know someone like me brave enough to wear them and adore my glory :)
Next we see Detective Trupo (Josh Brolin) signing drugs out of the evidence room in New York. Meanwhile an Italian gangster Rossi (Jon Polito) talks with Frank at a restaurant, explaining that Trupo and his men are seizing their drugs, cutting them down, and selling them back. They both agree that things are different with Bumpy not around to make sure no one bothers them. Rossi supplies Frank with drugs and we see some of the chaotic events going on due to Bumpy's absence. Rossi exclaims that order is needed.
Mother's Day. Gift for Ma? A bottle of Jameson. A happy Ma!
10. Chris Ware at the MCA, Chicago
How does something like this happen?
"Bottom Of The Well" - 4:29
~Respecting the distance:
It was quite a fun evening overall, I got to hear several inebriated and abbreviated versions of Norwegian history, which you will only get after a Norwegian engineer has had at least 4 beers. Hopefully everyone made it home safe and sound.
When you come to the end of your stem, rethread the laid threads onto your needle and take it to the back. Then take your overthread to the back in the same hole. If you're working a short line it might save time and be less hassle to use two needles and keep the first threaded with the laid threads. Either way is fine.
and on top of that not exactly smart
This is my version of the snood made world famous by Karen from Did You Make That? I made 3! This snood is made from Merino wool that I bought at the Brooklyn General Store in Brooklyn, New York and was my first knitting project in years. I started it in New York and finished it in Virginia! This one went to my friend who is heading back to France next month. Should keep her nice and toasty.
To the wonderful, polite, genuine publishers, publicists, and many many authors I've worked with here over the years, thank you! This anger is not for you. That's really important. But it seems like every day this idea of book blogging is becoming more mechanized and impersonal at the hands of external forces.
Thanks to everyone else who jumped in, too. I'm a little sad I didn't give away a book this time since it's so fun to get people hooked on new reads. So, I'm sure you guys can look forward to more giveaways in the future.
New friends that only impart fun and novelty into your life, without too much baggage. It's fun to party with new folk, and it's even better to make new memories.
Homeschooling ( home education or home based learning) is a legal option for parents in many countries, who mention various reasons to homeschool their children. The three most popular chosen by the majority of homeschooling parents in the United States are: concern about the traditional school environment, to provide religious or moral instruction, and dissatisfaction with academic instruction at traditional public and private schools.
The child’s birthdate is included in the story.
15. Philadelphia Eagles ILB Luke Kuechly (B.C.) I think the Eagles would be better served taking Zach Brown of UNC but they stick with a NE prospect and try to turn around this team.
There are two kinds of reasons. Some excuses grow out of the way in which you assign work. They’re truly marketing communications issues. And they’re your issues because you are the boss. You need to talk effectively so that your subordinates know what you want done so when.
But then, saving grace! my friend Karen--who, by the way, the bride doesn't know in real life, and who had no logical reason to be at her dream wedding--showed up. Karen happened to be wearing EXACTLY THE CORRECT EARRINGS!!!
-she's also cleaned up after herself on her own initiative
When you are writing, what’s your go-to food/snack/drink that you must have?
So in the midst of a mining boom the idea that Australia could enter recession is a very left field call and the Reserve Bank is going to everything in its power to ensure this doesn’t happen. But with the Government tightening their belt along with the Household sector the risks are rising that for the first time in a generation Australia heads into recession.That means that rates will probably still head substantially lower and hopefully take the Australian Dollar with them.
Next up, stripes. Stripes here, stripes there, stripes are everywhere... This is a trend that I would definitely say is timeless, but more "in" now than usual. Stripes are traditional enough that I don't think the style could ever be dated. But, what makes the "new" stripes so "in" is turning them from their traditional vertical line to a more updated horizontal.
Way too many Christians put popularity ahead of their obedience to Christ. This is absolutely evident in the number of youth who walk away from their faith when they no longer fit in a youth group. It is equally evident in the fact that youth groups are often, maybe even in my church, a place that youth feel more popular. I know this is often the goal of church leaders and parents. They hope that youth group is a place where the young Christians can find acceptance with their peers.
*”How was Europe?!” “Pretty good, How was your continued stay in the US?” “Pretty good too.” ”Okay, see you later.” This conversation will never happen.
I manage to
than oneself."
quality or geographical origin of those goods or services: or …
I have to say, I never feel quite as many envious stares as when I'm on the floor with a man who loves to dance. We aren't the best out there, but I do love a man who isn't afraid to be the first one out there and the last one standing.
Leslie L. Vadasz
I think it also says that you appreciate craft and creativity. These designs are all hand drawn from my inspiration and influences. So I guess that each design has a meaning and is not produced only to please the management or the market researchers. Like I said before, we see our T-shirts (in a small way) as a piece of illustrated art.
ravens and evenings with friends. and dogs.
What makes a cover memorable? For starters, it has to add some new dimension or have a different angle from the original. It could be a new context or maybe done in a different genre. Humor usually helps, and in my book, bizarre is a bonus.
Serena Chopra's first full-length book is forthcoming from Coconut Books in 2013. She has an MFA from the University of Colorado at Boulder. Her recent publications can be found in the Denver Quarterly, Fact-Simile, Pax Americana, and Umbrella Factory. She was a 2010 Kundiman Fellow. She lives, works, writes, and dances in Denver, Colorado.
So, I was kind of disappointed. My first ten miles, I was on track for about a 2:55-3:00 finish time (which while not fantastic, is still pretty freaking good for me). Then, after mile ten, it took me AN HOUR to go the last 3.1 miles. (Considering I was walking and "hobbling" the last three miles, I guess an hour isn't terrible, but still such a disappointment to have such an epic meltdown).
Next, I feathered in a light base blue of B91 and B63. I layered B66 over that, (B66 is the color spotlight color that I'll feature tomorrow). I deepened the blue with the BV23 and C7. I did not blend much, rather, I kept my strokes in the direction the feathers grow so it looks more like natural color variation.
You know, like a potluck, except you don't actually get to eat anything I'm bringing to the table...
4) Been there and done it !!
The mainstream view of Brian De Palma's 2000s output is anything but flattering, with all four of his films made in the new millennium bowing to intense critical pans and commercial indifference. However, I've found his contemporary work to rank among his best. Mission to Mars captures the boundless enthusiasm (and unabashed cheesiness) of old Disney space adventures, shot to favor near-poetry over scientific accuracy and all the better for it. Femme Fatale threw people with its narrative mulligan, but it made the strongest case to date for the director's actual feelings for women, which are far more complex than the lazy accusations of misogyny that have dogged him for so long. The Black Dahlia is, if anything, the only one of De Palma's films that can even stand with Carlito's Way in terms of sheer aesthetic and Romantic beauty. Its sloppy elements and awkward acting choices only add to its deliberate, yet gentle, attack on Hollywood. It may also be the most neatly contextualized of De Palma's films in his strange canon, fitting neatly with the more formal, big-budget experiments and the uncompromising anti-mainstream tone of his '70s and '80s work.
Moira just shook her pretty head as she usually does when I embark on a new idea and let me get on with it as, god bless her, she usually does..
Wallace is correct. As this gas price chart from GasBuddy.com shows, gas prices plummeted in late 2008, just prior to Obama’s inauguration:
Levesque is no ordinary lobbyist. She is credited with encouraging the type of bare-knuckle politics now common in the wider education-reform movement. In an audio file obtained by The Nation, she and infamous anti-union consultant Richard Berman outlined a strategy in October 2010 for sweeping the nation with education reforms. The two spoke at the Philanthropy Roundtable, a get-together of major right-wing foundations. Lori Fey, a representative of the Michael Dell Foundation, moderated the panel discussion.
Prairie of the pampas of Madagascar, Paraguay
So I ask: is this dependence on nature’s resources and processes hard for us to handle? Is it because it highlights our vulnerability that it may be difficult to connect with this reality? Are we in denial of our dependence? Would that account for the fact we are increasing our dependence and vulnerability?
11/19 – Primary fermentation appears to be over. Removed blow-off.
If the hero wins the battle, he gets the reward. This can be a sword or a golden fleece or a beautiful princess. Mattie is after revenge; Rango seeks water and P.K. wants to cash in a valuable document. But the prize itself is almost always immaterial. The real prize is the knowledge the hero gains, sometimes even if he ‘loses’. In the Western genre the lesson is often a hard one. Mattie learns that revenge does not come without a price. Rango learns that as sheriff, he can be a real contributing member of a community not just a play actor. P.K. learns … well, I’ll leave that for you to find out.
I've coloured her with distress inks re-inkers, yeah really into these can you tell lol,
Tom: See you!
Can you see how the combination of ‘sacredness’ and ‘rules’ were slowly sprouting into a creed of some sort, -- or to put it another way, into a statement of faith, commitment, devotion, -- in other words, a religion!
In some cases people with autism may also experience over- or under-sensitivity to sounds, touch, taste, smell, light or colours. Many may display a love of routines, certain special – some might say obsessive – interests and in some cases other learning disabilities.
I think there are two types of worry warts. Those who worry before. And those who worry afterwards. I'm in the first camp. I will go over and over and over a decision, turning it inside out, lying awake at night with 'what ifs' and 'why nots?'. Once the decision is made, however, I never look back. No regrets. It is what it is. One must get on with it.
The last two questions are probably out of my league. After all, I can’t control what’s inside your head. That’s for you to decide.
Cook
Once upon a time two beer connoisseurs named Thomas and Philip took a morning drive out to Southampton Brewery in...well...Southampton. The brewery was throwing their annual Russian Imperial Stout release party, to which everyone was invited. There were high spirits among both connoisseurs as they drove at a constant, but quick pace towards the wonderful party they were about to attend.
Education: Bachelor of Arts in Psychology and a minor in Spanish from George Mason University in Fairfax, Virginia.
The B.O.B Yak may become my favorite bicycle accessory since the handle bar cup holder.
The selection of beers will likely be primarily European, especially Belgian and German, but a variety from other countries, including Japanese microbrews, will be available.
Of those who were involved
--hair & boots: burnt sienna, cocoa, 4655-T
The developer recently restructured its original agreement with the MTA to enable it to exit the purchase of the Phase II properties for a minimal or no breakup fee depending on timing. Based on the timing of the payments, we believe that this indicates that the developer is concerned about its ability to complete the project within the stated 10 year time frame.
There was nothing I could do to stop it from clinging onto me. So, I picked him up and took him into the house... knowing the whole time that it wasn't staying here! I have enough cats, thank you very much. All the other cats agreed with me, but we got out voted by Sgt and the dog! As you can see, the dog and the kitten have a very close relationship...actually the dog is obsessed with the kitten. Raven follows the kitten around constantly, sniffing, licking, and in general annoying the little guy to no end. We eventually have to pick the kitten up so he doesn't drown from doggie kisses. Yes, the secret is out, my dog loves cats.
“And be ye kind one to another, tender hearted, forgiving one another, even as God for Christ’s sake hath forgiven you.”
Oh, and then there is the immense amount of passive-aggressiveness. How do you even deal with passive-aggressive people? They always seem so nice at first but then they say something completely offensive in a really upbeat and positive tone. Seriously, look at any of the Emily Gilmore quotes included for prime examples.
I've mentioned before that I've never really had much of a stash when it comes to my yarn. I usually like to buy the yarn once I know what I want to knit. But the reason for that has usually been that Hobby Lobby and Michael's just don't have the kind of yarn I (or anyone for that matter) would want to stash!
I have been investing for many years now, and it seems easy to me now. I do remember, however, when I first started investing that I didn’t have any idea what I was doing. I asked myself, “where can i buy coins“.
Hula Hooping, Strengthening my kiddo’s core, helping them become more coordinated, stronger from the inside out. Creating a healthy pattern of movement, building their self esteem…my children began being able to retain information and learn better, with hula-hooping.
Now – if SECULARISM is “a MAJOR CRIME” for Muslims, and “a great challenge to the national identity of Muslims” (and I think we must understand “national” here to mean the body of the Muslim people, not merely a geographic territory where the PEOPLE itself is the resident NATION), then:
2. Lack of communication, obstinacy and lack of information disclosure by a company when I make an enquiry about their services. This is often combined with a ‘send us your MS or we’re saying nothing’ about what we will provide or charge.
Pour into a bowl. Place a piece of waxed paper on top of pudding to prevent a film from forming. Cover and chill in refrigerator until set, about 2 hours.
The Rabbinic Council of Progressive Rabbis of Australasia put their support for same-sex marriage on the record back in June.
Battery Pack-
Me: Here Lord Dormir. Cuddle time!
-On the 5th of the month, you will receive your penpal pairing via email. It will be your responsibility to contact your penpal and get their mailing address and any other information you might need like allergies or dietary restrictions.
Oh, and for those of you who are frustrated with all the different submission guidelines out there, I want to point out that my guidelines don't ask for the first chapter but Seré sent it anyway, and I am so glad that she did. From the first paragraph, I knew she could write, and I requested the entire thing and read it immediately. So I am going to add one more rule of thumb here:
Heartbreakingly beautiful pop songs, utilising just an electric guitar and vocals. Think Kate Bush singing through Johanna Newsom’s mouth and you’re on the right track. You won’t fail to fall in love
But if we end the conversation, then what have we gained? We might stay safe; we might feel righteous and satisfied at having the last word. But what have we really gained?
easily condenses down to only one Law: do unto others as you would
Yesterday’s attack came just days after two safety warnings from the Chinese embassy in Canberra for citizens travelling in Australia. Many Chinese students studying in Australia have expressed their fear over growing violence directed against them.
every page is lined with scraps from my pile
As Ridhuan has liked to point out countless times before, the assimilation of Chinese in Indonesia was carried out with 100 percent thoroughness.
Did you know that Middle-earth, the quintessential fantasy world, is a low magic setting? There is actually very little magic in Middle-earth. In fact, Tolkien disliked using the word magic. As Galadriel says to Sam in The Fellowship of the Ring:
when his mind is clear,
The email has been met with confusion from manufacturers who believe the Diamond Jubilee and London 2012 provide a unique nationwide marketing opportunity for their products. One supplier said: ‘There was a stunned silence in the office when the email landed because it makes absolutely no sense.
The Tramp never occupied less time on screen than he does here. Kid Auto Races is brief: just under seven minutes, with a plot equivalent to one gag in a later Chaplin short. The ‘odd character’ is a spectator at a go-kart race, more or less: kid drivers in motorless cars are pushed to the top of a steep wooden slide, then roll down it and along a winding track. The crowd swells at each turn and a local film crew (a Keystone crew, let’s say) positions its camera to catch the action. And time after time, their view is blocked by the Tramp.
We don’t know who it was…
fire came a gentle whisper." (1 Kings 19:11-12 NIV)
1. The addictive process is recognizable. I agreed with this statement and it matched with my experience. Patients have many disorders that have a great deal of similarity to the original symptoms of alcohols as presented Jellinek and other models of drug addiction. I also see that there are critical differences that set them apart.
I hope it goes ahead. That part of Williamsburg is not the one Manhattanites(and others) project their hipster musings on, and the residents of that immediate area really could use some urban renewal with them in mind.
y hago las piedras de llorar,
When I was eight she remarried. My new stepfather came with an added bonus feature – a six year old stepsister whom I loathed nearly as much as him.
You take that antibacterial wipe and wipe a toy that now your young son or daughter is going to stick in their month! or you wipe their hands, then they pick up their food to digest along with the flavor enhance of chemicals you just placed on their hands!
Awnings all around. Whenever possible, we park so our street-side wall faces north or east and misses the hot afternoon sun. Our curb-side wall gets shaded by our awning. Our next RV will also have awnings for all the windows. Glass radiates a lot of heat to the inside of an RV.
"It is just violating a person's right to privacy," said state Rep. La Shawn Ford, D-Chicago. After hearing from constituents who said they were asked to turn over Facebook access to prospective employers, Ford introduced a bill that would make the request illegal.
Towards the back door of the apartment, we ran. I had my shitty baton still clutched in my hand, thinking it best I keep the evidence with us.
Remind yourself that you are living in a place with weak regulations - the chicken may have hormones and you won't know it. The building may not have a fire escape. Its elevator may not have been inspected in years. Always believe that God is on your team.
Please let me know if you enjoyed my file and let me see what you do with it. I also think he would be cute made into a "she" bunny (add some lace to the bottom of the vest and make a dress and add a bow to an ear) or holding an Easter Egg or an Easter Basket. Just use your imagination!
Indeed, their whole influence goes toward widening breaches, intensifying bitterness, and exciting anger and hatred.
Strangely deleted and never reissued, this was the band reaching their peak when it came to recording an album. The early singles were superior work, and I always found the first two albums a tad fiddly and unnecessary in places. The importance of a good producer is also evident when comparing the Y Records release with this, the Arista (RCA distributed at the time) release. Paul Groucho Smykle has coated everything in a smooth adhesive-like production which bonds ten very different tracks into a highly cohesive and enjoyable listen. It is funky in all the right places, soft and gentle in others, the lyrics as always mean little with Carl Marsh and Barry Andrews sharing the vocal roles with great effect.
Him: "Yay Orange...they're my favorite team ya know"
Hooray! Less than 24 hours until Insurgent is released!!
THE rich world’s troubles and inequalities have been making headlines for some time now. Yet a more important story for human welfare is the persistence of yawning gaps between the world’s haves and have-nots. Adjusted for purchasing power, the average American income is 50 times that of a typical Afghan and 100 times that of a Zimbabwean. Despite two centuries of economic growth, over a billion people remain in dire poverty.
Designers like when clients are clear about what they like, don’t like, are drawn to, etc. Designers dislike when clients tell them what to do. A designer is NOT a software peddler, they get paid for their ideas, not because they know how to use Illustrator and you don’t.
While that may be the strangest post title I've ever used, it's true. Last week, Joann's was getting rid of their Halloween section at 60% off, and I happened across a rather fantastic mullet wig with matching mustache. For the bargain price of $5, it was too funny NOT to buy it, so it came home with me. I didn't really think too much about what my costume plans were but, using the mullet as my entire inspiration, I woke up yesterday and raided my husband's closet for the most redneck things I could find and ended up with this.
Longoniza Pork Chops
Wind turbines could warm local climates up to ten times faster than the natural rate, a study has shown.
3. You will make 6 cards all duplicates. You will have 66 cards at the end of the 11 month challenge. IF you need more, please go ahead and add to your monthly total and post that on your blog when you submit your cards in the Linky at the bottom of the post.
Through the language glass,
Imagine that, an individual, although we know it’s a particular faction, attacks a faith group knowing the reaction it may cause, knowing that in the ensuing conflict created by them somebody may get killed and they don’t care ,they really don’t care. AAWR operates somewhat differently to most nationalist sites, rather than adopting the new line, we and certainly this writer believes that traditional nationalism is the only way, that contestation of any and all groups who undermine, attack or exploit us is both desirable and indeed necessary. Indeed it is easy to look about us, to view the wider world and to see the hand of Zion creating mischief, it seems that all of the world’s great religions can be attacked, that centuries old faith systems can simply be ridiculed, their adherents belittled regardless of cost to peace and stability.
You've probably seen something similar to these without the sauce and garlic in the bread. I've made those a few times in the past. I've never posted them because I don't really like posting things I don't love, and they're good, but not great. But I found the missing link. Also, I did not measure out anything. Pizza is all about personalization. I tried to guess out about how much I put of everything, but if you use more or less that's fine!
In the meantime, large areas of land in the neighborhood are being destroyed, and will set as empty lots. Not being used for any purpose while the developer stalls for time.
- Hola! Como estas?- How much does “X” coast?
Let sit in the pan for 5 minutes before removing to wire rack. When completely cool. slice to serve..
A certain
6. Miami Beach Rumba - Edmundo Ros & His Orchestra
Looking back towards the west, the clouds were still lifting off the peaks..
You should know by now, that I'm a big lover of peacockfeathers and such. If you didn't know, than you haven't been reading everything I've written so far. Shame on you! ;)
Nantes Kelder, Head of Community Safety at AfriForum said the possible reasons for this decision raises concern. The investigating officer Danie Nortjé, told Kelder that they had the case transferred because the dead youth's father, a retired police officer, "may have an influence on the court proceedings in the Westonaria regional court.
Velazquez gets a response: "I do not know how New York City can survive just by building luxury buildings everywhere. We need to diversify our waterfront. We need to have a waterfront that will allow for the different stakeholders to be part of it. It is so important that we educate our public, because once it's done, that will be it. The waterfront will be gone."
Negative messages stick more than positive ones and can quickly lead to unmotivated employees.
"For (nacawfee?) program, press 4
Just another Mad Men Sunday, Jameson and Ginger Ale was the drink of the night with a little squeeze of lime and once again kicked up Pete’s onion dip served with Salt-free Utz chips.
Already, I don’t feel quite well. I get the same “buzzed” feeling as the other times my medication, though it feels a bit more intense this time. (Maybe it’s just been long enough that I’ve forgotten.) I get the usual intestinal problems (though lexapro is much better than sertraline for that). I’m still tired tonight.
At night when the sun sleeps and the sky has only the moons natural light and 360’s glow to brighten up the sky, is when the crowd of fun loving party people come to mingle.
All the Heritage Chromes that I grabbed turned out to be refractors #'d/559, an added bonus! The Barajas will stay here as part of the Jays collection (of course), and if anyone is interested in the Miles, Beato or Morrow cards, just let me know.
If pressure from your parents is causing you to grow the guest list offer this compromise: A small wedding ceremony and reception then go on your honeymoon and allow your parents to host a post-wedding reception bash in your honor when you're back. You can also have a small ceremony in your hometown and then a few days (or weeks) later have a reception with the larger guest list.
I will leave you with a bunch more pictures of the boys because hey I have been out of the loop with updates! Enjoy :)
What are you afraid of? Tweet, email or comment below!
1 medium onion, finely chopped
The sound of the explosion around 8am prompted a flood of calls to law enforcement agencies on both sides of the Sierra Nevada in the two states.
The other conspicuous absences in my childhood were cookbooks. Indian recipes, as is well known, are usually passed down as oral traditions, or on scribbled bits of papers. Even today, I rarely see mum referring to a cookbook. She actually gets amused when I try and pin down quantities so I can write them up for the blog. Her usual method of explanation goes along the lines of 'well, add a handful of this and a pinch of that, and a spoon of this and a couple glugs on that'. Yep, helpful. Not! On ocasion I saw mum using a recipe that was found in a local weekly paper. But we never had those glossy coffee table style cookbooks that everybody seems to own now.
All manuscripts submitted should be one of the following three types of paper:
It is then, that it hits me. Some people have kids to complete their families. Or to start a boy band they can sell into indentured servitude on the Disney Channel. I had them for material. Seriously? It’s a little hard to believe Letterman and Leno need a team of writers. Then again, they are rich and famous and I’m not. So they probably know something I don’t. However, if you have kids and you can’t laugh, you’re spending too much time on your iPod, iPad, or iHaveSoMuchToDoICan’tHearAWordYou’reSaying.
Examples:
Here I was in a place far removed from friends and family (Facebook, emails, and Skype only take you so far).
While it’s clear from the beginning (there’s even a proposal of marriage met with the fact that Philip isn’t proper – not that Cleone doesn’t love him), that Philip and Cleone are in love and what not – there is a rival. This rival, Bancroft, represents the ‘change’ that Philip must undergo to have Cleone – hopefully – realize he is fit to marry.
How do I decide which of the conflicting imperatives is more important? People don’t like this idea, because they don’t understand it: They think it is immoral to give priority to the defense of the citizens of your state over the protection of the lives of the neighbors of the terrorists. They don’t understand that the world is built in such a way that responsibility is divided.
In that place.”
- 27th-29th: Stress beyond belief. So glad that lifted a little. -
The Design Team is showcasing Cuttlebug products this week. Its not mandatory to join in but if you have them, why not pull them out & use them?!?!
5. Lose Yourself
Now, the first thing I find wrong with this is that they said they were going to chug some ice cream. How do you chug ice cream? Do I want to know? The bigger problem though, is that they believe in the magic window. I had heard of this before. The magic window is, so people believe, this time period after you exercise where any calories you take
once I started watching series 1 of The Wire, I couldn't manage anything else. It was a kind of research.
Best Animation: Winner – SUSUtv (Bedtime, Kevin!)/ Highly Commended – LSTV (The Midnight Ghost)
A brief synopsis. I'd just divorced. I was single, alone, my daughter in my ex's questionable care. I was lonely, scared, unsure. So, I seized the outstretched hand of a friend who lived about 120 miles south, in Baton Rouge. He was single, intelligent, creative, and a good friend to help you forget about your woes. I spent several months of weekends driving down to Baton Rouge to stay with this friend, travel around, ride bikes all over town and country, tour the USS Kidd which he was a tour guide on, and in general try and fail miserably and repeatedly to pick up girls.
The family had a teenage daughter, but Traylor did not provide information on her whereabouts. The dead were a 39-year-old woman and two boys, ages 8 and 13, Traylor said.
A few hours after I watched “Mirror Mirror” someone asked me what I thought of it and my response was “Snow White was a little hottie!”, and I must admit I was quite taken with newcomer Lily Collins. Collins is very charismatic and gives a nice performance as Snow White. She’s sweet and lovable and you can understand why the Prince falls for her and the Queen loathes her. Even one of the dwarfs quickly develops a strong attraction to her (the other dwarfs obviously love her, too, but not in the same way). Collins, the daughter of Genesis drummer and vocalist Phil Collins, shines bright in the movie and will no doubt be a star to watch over the next few years.
There's no particular reason you should know Davis, but if you know my work on moonshine, you've felt his touch. I met Davis, an anthropology professor, more than twenty years ago as an undergraduate student at what's now called Truman State University. By chance I took his introductory anthropology class to fill a general requirement. It was a fateful decision.
the Pizza Gods. There is no better place on
The weather sucks in Austin tonight, which means I get to play my favorite Austin news-watching game, namely "Turn On All the Broadcasts and Listen to Them Say How Much the Weather Sucks Tonight."
Considering our diverse and varied experiences and the unique connection formed by two people, every relationship is completely different. Still, research shows that when it comes down to how we form and behave in relationships, pretty much everyone falls into one of three categories: anxious, avoidant, or secure. It’s called the attachment theory, and according to astudy published in the Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, about 20 percent of people are anxious and roughly 25 percent fall into the avoidant camp, while the rest of the population are considered secure.
The story of Japan, Korea and China: their companies exploited cheap labour to reassemble and remake products at a fraction of European and US prices.Samsung tore apart microwaves imported from Japan and the US. Hyundai showed down giants like Ford and Mitsubishi by using their expertise shared through alliances. In China, copying can range from specific products to entire stores, including that of, well, Apple.
How far does her customer base reach?
I’ve lined them up from oldest to youngest, left to right and back to front. The eldest pair is the lime green Colin Stuart pumps and the baby of the family is the plaid pumps. They’re only a few minutes older than the green peep-toes (both purchased just yesterday).
So I've been quiet. One marriage break up and a few breakdowns later and I'm once again ready for action. I joined 'Ravelry' yesterday and it inspired me to blow the dust off this blog and start using it again. So a lot has changed, I've gained many pounds and lost a few, I've moved house but one thing has remained the same. My love of yarn and all that it implies.
I think pitch correction is OK as long as you don't hear it. Some band would suck without pitch correction, most R&B bands, and others would lose their character, (like) Sonic Youth. I would recommend to singer to smoke a lot and drink a lot - not when singing, though. Also it can be helpful to play the melody on a piano and sing with it to get the notes right in the head. I am not a good singer and sometimes on stage I can be very "shaky". Mostly because of stress. . . getting better though.
to peel our bells sweet toll
Happy Simply Solo Spotlight Tuesday! Today’s guest post is written by Courtney from Clduncan75, the “ME” Project, which is a blog about finding ways to beat back the flames of middle age with lip gloss and, possibly, bikini wax.
The following things--"normal" things--disappear when I have a deadline.
As previously stated, Kamrava lost his medical license (with good reason) back in July. The California Medical Board qualified his treatment of “Octomom” Nadya Suleman as “gross negligence” and acted accordingly.
You want to talk about cool, how cool would it be to give sight to the blind. If you have the pure absolute truth in your pocket, it would be better than any set of glasses or contact lenses ever made. The truth would help the blind to see. You are telling me that is not the kind of stuff that would blow up the ratings on a reality show! What a reality that would be, to travel from town to town and give people who are blind the gift of sight. Are you telling me, if you could do it, you wouldn’t? I know I would. That is how cool it would be to be in the center of the truth. I am not there, but man would I love to be there!
How do you deal with things that prevent you from doing your job to the best of your ability? What coping mechanisms do you use when crunch time approaches?
Get your policy out of your file cabinet, dust it off, and check to see if you’ve got this coverage. It could make a huge difference.
jocks, bullies, cool blond class presidents, cheerleaders know what to avoid,
Records — Pelham 3-3; Blind Brook 0-6.
My finances are divinely blessed God.
Embroider Jack face on with brown.
Today, give a stranger one of your smiles. It might be the only sunshine he sees all day. ~Quoted in P.S. I Love You, compiled by H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
Quentin Tarantino is a little funny looking somehow, but his movies kick azz don't they? I mean, KILL BILL = The GREATEST.
Now just think…if governments and investment companies can do shit THIS stupid..what’re they doing that’s REALLY stupid!??!
Anyway, onto the favourites...
Last year for Easter I made these birds nest cupcakes. And this year, when I saw this blog post at Just a Taste on how to make a jello egg inside of a real egg shell, I was enamored with the idea, and I wanted to make layered jello eggs for Easter! I was already brainstorming in my head how I would do it, what I'd do with the leftover insides of the egg, what colors/flavors of jello I would use ... and then while I was at the grocery store later that week, I found this crazy gadget - it's specifically meant for making jello eggs! Best of all, it was free with the purchase of 3 boxes of jello! Score!
Trees and woods are vital to the health and well-being of people in the UK. Studies suggest a strong link between the quality of the natural environment where people live and their health and well-being. Doctors recommend that every adult should do 30-minutes of exercise, five days a week, yet less than 25% of women and 40% of men meet this target.
Take me to that other place
Someone sitting a few seats away heard what I said, and asked, “Really? You must tell me about it.” I winked at her, and gestured that I would tell her after class. She nodded. A girl sitting next to her—and who might not like me very much—rolled her eyes and muttered, “I don’t need you to waste my time;” yep,
Some Somali observers however think otherwise. Some suggested that the idea of defeating al-Shabaab through military means is not only simplistic, but also highly improbable, and gave a host of reasons why it will fail. Others looked at Somalia’s recent past, including the Ethiopian invasion of 2006 to justify fears as to why military action will never work, while others drew on the country’s complex sociopolitical dynamics as a reason why enforcing peace is impossible. Still, others raised doubts as to whether Kenya and the AU have the military capacity to sustain an invasion in Somalia for long.
I'm afraid to disturb
Have you seen a change in their lives?
Q. Many college students would love to land an internship or first job like yours. What recommendations do you have for them?
Just apply to clean dry surface, sand with 120 grit,
Ain't Talkin' 'bout Love
The hardest part was deciding how to put it all together.
That was before Sara Leonard got involved with the Idaho Coalition Against Domestic and Sexual Assault’s teen dating programs — The Center for Healthy Teen Relationships and Start Strong Idaho.
Jason works very hard on updating our Boswell's Best 20% off selections every week, but I don't really do that great a job of keeping you informed of what they are. Today's the kind of day where I just want to look at books, so here are four that I'm browsing.
Here are five of my top holiday tips that have helped me through the seasons and will hopefully help make your holiday a little easier:
Veggies: 4
It not all been good though, I have had too many deaths in the family and many ups and downs in my marriage, but all in all, I think that this year has been one of my best ever!
The entrepreneurial culture that was instilled early on at ESPN is present throughout. The company still takes risks, still suffers when the on-air talent act inappropriately without comprehending how their actions can cause a stir, and still seems like a place where youthful vigor can pay off if presented at the right moment. Take Mark Shapiro, the whiz-kid producer who scored the top job for the “100 Years of Sports” project at age 26, by responding to an offer for the number-two job by saying “What do you mean, number two?” Seems that “moxie” is a requirement for working at ESPN.
LAIYX Blog (laiyxblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Shiner 98 Bavarian Amber
I have had this dresser for years. It went with me on every move, and lived in my house during construction. Many times people have tried to get me to give it up, but I have held on to it. Now everyone can see what I have always seen with this dresser. That is: just how beautiful it really is. To jog your memory on this baby go here, but for the rest of you below is the before.
Want to see--- Consistency: keep doing the activity over time
A Town Without Christmas ... INSP ... 10 PM
2/1 vs. Toronto, W 100-64 (W -9.5), Under
The weather over the past few days has been co-operating, at least some of the time, and so we’ve been able to play outside in the yard. Yesterday was 7 degrees in the afternoon, though on Monday morning everything had a light dusting of snow, I suppose just to remind me that I live in Canada in case I’d forgotten, which I hadn’t.
Done.
together at the latter day and cry all 'We died at
With gossamer negligees wrapped around their swollen bodies, executives' wives hung tiny white gowns to warm for expected off spring.
Naturally, all three of those things happen as the movie progresses. When Gizmo, as Billy names it, gets wet, he spawns a group of hellion Mogwai who wreak mischievous havoc. When they trick Billy into feeding them after midnight by cutting the wire to his clock, they become far more sinister creatures who terrorize the town before being destroyed in the climax.
I put all of the individual movies in the front of the bin, and then halfway through, I placed all of our movies with sequels, leaving some extra spaces for ones we know are coming out or we need to add too. And of course, it's never hard to find a movie in the case because we always have our movie inventory key to reference!
To make a short story looooong, my feather "obsession" has been cultivated for years. Let me explain... While growing up in Denmark, long walks have always been part of the "routine", and often we would find feathers form all kind of different birds. Ranging from the really long skinny pheasant feathers, to the tiny little fluffy dotted and bright blue ones. My mother would often bring the really decorative ones home, they would become a piece of artwork in a windowsill or on a pin board.
To me, this needed a more vintage feel card, something I don't do often enough. So I pulled out some of my lovely Waltzingmouse Stamps, and had a play!
I'm going to run the garbage down, pick up a dog nail trimmer and toilet seat. My hubs will take a daughter to a movie marathon at the theater today and I'll get some laundry done and hopefully finish my M.O.G dress today. This weekend went way too fast and I didn't get any sewing done rather than a longing look. The bedroom switcheroo was too intense and my sewing area was high traffic...
I'd really like to see the film but I know already from having seen the trailer that it's going to be a tough row given my French skills. Maybe one of you fluent speakers out there would like to go with me and help me through the parts I don't get?
Step 12 (In Which Redemption Tastes Sweet Like Brandy): I dust the top with cocoa powder and confectioners sugar. We set it on the dessert table and in a few hours, we devour every crumb. The cakes are soaked with coffee syrup, the cheese creamy and light. The grated chocolate adds the perfect hint of sweetness. It is a dessert triumphant.
I went to the recipe section once again... after browsing the beautiful rooms, I found yet another recipe to try out in the Dinner Tonight section.
I do want to mention Jordan Whatcott pitched the last three innings of the game in relief. He was amazing, growing stronger as he went, even striking out the last two batters he faced. After this stunning performance, Jordan was sent up to Reading where he got his first AA win last night. Congratulations Jordan!
This month I have actually been very busy stitching and unfortunately frogging! I made a mistake in counting on my Spring Exchange so had to remove about 20 stitches. Just goes to show you shouldn't stitch when you're tired! At least I noticed before too much damage was done and it was a very easy fix!
Back in 2008 I wrote a post about My class of Choice. At the time I was an alt-a-holic, with 3 characters who were regularly played in Warcraft, and many more who were used as profession mules.
One way to make the most of social networking sites is to tie them to attractive sales promotions. People will want to like your Facebook page if they know this is a good way to have access to discounts. Social networking sites should be used so that your customers can have a better understand of you and your company. They should also start to be a little more closely involved with your products and brands.
A mesh of figures from fashion, music and media came in abundance with the likes of Beyonce, wearing a sheer, beaded black to purple Givenchy Haute Couture by Riccardo Tisci gown; while Alicia Keys, chose a luxe-tux look, complementing her husband, Swiss Beatz’s attire; and Gwyneth Paltrow, who wore a knee-length, silver Prada number.
We arrive at the Sheraton Waikiki *brrrrring* room upgraded. Ocean view. Holy Buckets! (LENT!) It's straight out of a movie. I've never seen such beautiful water...and turtles. Just big old sea turtles hanging out. I'm in love.
1971 Live at Club 7
if you use Internet Banking, just copy and paste the detail will be fine.
Around the champagne bucket we are pretending is a loving cup or trophy, I've placed horseracing mementos. The photo-finish is a picture of a race horse we had before the children, Her name was My Moon Molly and she's the one in the front!!
Looking for ways to get your ex back? Here’s some free advice on how to get your ex back.
We were finally in bed and the lights were off.
5/4 – South Orange, NJ – Seton Hall Univ
Duties: The Internship Position may consist of performing the following tasks independently and/or in assistance with the Co-Presidents.
The initiative, which includes selling toll-free 888 telephone numbers but is otherwise vague, was included in the $1.7 trillion spending package for fiscal 1998 the White House sent to Congress last Thursday.
Almost anything written by Jim Morrison and the Doors.
The Ideal Wish- Early Morning Laps
This past Saturday, we brewed a nice Belgian style ale.
S5-058 Ironwork Accents
The traditional soup from Japan is called ZONI and The MISO Soup. Miso soup is the most serve at the japanese resto. Now here at SAKE Restaurant
Mr. Obama probably now regrets having said there would be no hand-slapping. No pictures. Nothing that might boost Al Qaeda recruitment. Shucks, a few snapshots of the deceased terrorist would have come in handy now to bolster Mr. Obama’s defense posture.
Relational church allows people to openly and publicly relate to one another by sharing encouraging words, Scriptures, needs, concerns, prayers, gifts of the Spirit, and testimonies in a safe, loving environment.
At the time of the American Revolution there were five major social classes. They included New England merchants; Southern planters; royalists (the lawyers, notaries, and everybody else who pushed paper for the Crown; shopkeepers, artisans, and laborers; and small farmers.
Today, I have the final installment of my ornament swapping for this year!!! So excited---although, it will be a bit sad not to be expecting any pretties in the mail...*sigh*
Michelle Obama
- Washable coated canvas lining
"Healthified" Shake (coconut milk) = 355 calories, 31g fat, 15 g protein, 8.9g carbs, 4.4g fiber
We saw Bilbo’s meeting with the three trolls. One positive aspect of the 48fps is that since everything looks so video, the digital creatures look more like they’re on the set. The tone of the scene is very playfully threatening, with the trolls having dim reactions. The scene ends with the dwarves coming to Bilbo’s rescue in a big battle against the trolls.
The weekend really as been enjoyable so far...busy and knackering as hell, but still fun. We've seen alot of new faces and a bloody good chunk of familiar ones (which is always good to see) but there's still a few days left to go so i hope to see some more beer being drunk by you all soon.
hence all the slightly awkward self portraits.
I’m sitting here, alone, in my living room, no one is online to talk with at the moment, and I’m thinking ‘is there any deeper loneliness or emptiness that the realization that, no matter HOW hard you try, no matter HOW HARD you work at it…your best efforts just aren’t good enough’ ? I don’t know if there is.
I also disagreed somewhat with the extreme focus on cutting out words. At some point, the words - even the seemingly superfluous ones - are what make the story and bring us into the moment. The winning story in our group exercise at the end of the session was 31 words - cut from over 200. In my opinion, it left out so many details that made the story real and relatable. We do need to strike a balance, and this was left out of our discussion.
Wondering what to do
Draw perpendiculars from A and B
This is actually my first year of Script Frenzy, I’ve tried NaNoWriMo before but never succeeded (so far). I’ve had the idea for this script for about a year and it’s been kept on the back burner by other projects and my day job. Script Frenzy was an ideal opportunity to dust it off and get some words down.
Galileo became professor of mathematics at Padua in Venice, partially because of his great reputation for invention. He designed and built various instruments in his own workshop, which he then sold, including a thermometer and a slide-rule for which he wrote and published a manual.
I tried for three years to get pregnant. Three very long years during which it seemed like I kept ClearBlue in business - each month I would pee on the little stick and spend a few minutes wishing before binning the inevitably negative result. We both had fertility tests and many long talks about what we would do if it never happened for us, "it" being the magical positive result. When the day came that I did my by then routine test and it actually popped up positive I was stunned, my husband and I just stood in the kitchen hugging each other and crying because those three long years were finally over.
Greens Senator Scott Ludlam said “Senator Stephen Conroy, representing whoever is the Foreign Minister at the moment, provided meaningless responses to these vital questions”.
How sad. How sad that so many of us perceive that it is our right to withhold and grant freedoms to our children. How sad it is that so many of us fail to see that only through freedoms - freedoms which we, as parents, have no power to restrict or grant, but only to support and embrace - will our children fully learn a life lesson in all of its nuances and subtleties. But how wonderful that those of us who "get it", or are on the way to getting it, are graced with the inner beauty of the spirit of a child who is free to learn about their world and define in whatever way makes the most sense to them. And though we may sometimes falter or stumble along the way, it is a journey we make together, with our children, hand in hand, in respect and love and freedom, just the way it's supposed to be.
Praying for those who had to deal with severe weather this year.
Please stop growing up so fast? Please?
34. In The Pines
I wish you peace and serenity, despite any last minute rushing that might be part of your holiday
“Count me in,” I say. “Can I have a cruller?”
Question 4: If you could, please name your top 3 weapons you would chose in a fight to the death, excepting ranged weapons and lightsabers?
Glory -- Liz Phair
In conclusion, I think it’s safe to say that the global headlines of death and destruction serve a more nefarious purpose of generating liquid assets and irrational fear, than is warranted by the extant situation. Furthermore, the people in the affected areas have, at some level, made conscious choices to live with the risks, just as I have. Disasters, such as tidal waves and volcanoes, touch a primal nerve in most people, and so make for good copy that sells papers and draws viewers. In relation to how folks are reacting locally, the 72-point banner headlines worldwide are nothing short of sensationalism and hyperbole. I am convinced that there is a cadre of paper-pushers salivating at the prospects of bags of aid money.
I spent a record low this time. I only bought a couple items. The only flea market purchase was a single action airbrush that was labeled "never used," though when I got home & unboxed it there was obviously paint on it. I only paid $15, so we'll see how it goes. In terms of figures I bought a set of Eureka 18th century civilians that includes their string quartet set, C. E. Bach & his clavichord, Fredrick playing the flute, and Fredrick & Voltaire out for a walk. I also grabbed two packs of hobbits from Goblin Factory, and some pirate women from Bronze Age. That's it.
Ford is able to find Lauren when she comes to him in her own dreams, beckoning him to find her, even though they have never met.
Chrysler Australia did not respond to the ad watchdog’s request for comment.
So, given Austen’s preference for the “gay” consciously (as seen in her letters to Anna), Austen would go for Harriet Byron primarily to start with. Then maybe she’d swing round for another correction, and then another.
Transatlantic Counterjihad contributions at OSCE
Now, why am I rambling on about all this? It’s because the entertainment industry seems to have an infatuation at the moment for digging up famous properties from the past and turning them into something new so as to cash in on their success, often with disastrous results. It is a golden age for the remake, although it is often at the cost of the original’s credibility.
The AHS British Pale Ale is near a Bass Ale. I've brewed this using the late addition for the extract to keep the stuff from carmelizing on the bottom of the brew pot. It works well - there was hardly anything there at cleanup. I'm also going to dry hop with 1/2 ounce of Summit. I'm trying to pull the orange/tangerine flavors out of those hops.
Because it was designed to.
This seems like a lot to fit into one episode, but we will see.
Liu’s campaign has spent more than $100,000 on lawyers and legal fees so far this year — more than he raised in campaign contributions.
Side Note
A small study published in 2007 in Psychological Reports found that the dreams of people who ate a high amount of organic food differed from those who ate “junk foods.” The authors hypothesize that certain foods may negatively influence dreaming.
the ceiling reacted from its inner eye
By María Camp
What is it with this large faction of the Democratic Party that are at best blinded by ideology and at worst are complete morons? This is the 3rd election in the row that the Democrats not only can win, but will win...if only they put up a candidate who a) has vision, b) isn't tied to a previous administration, and c) can pull the independents and centrist voters in.
Have done something completely different than my normal, yikes what is normal, lol, but there is such a fun challenge over at Recycle, Re-purpose and Re-Invent , the challenge blog of CS Designs .
Even as I write, I hear the lone "tick-tock"
Imagination is a vector-bird of the creational salt-plate
Note: My hubby did save me a piece (it was chocolate) and it was sooooo good. It was soft and not very sweet - just perfect!
My newly acquired ability to say NO
2. Surround my colleague in bright pink loving light, within a bubble.Hand the bubble over to God. This is to make sure that I allow her to deal with all her issues herself, as I do tend to take on other people’s problems.
The labels are Spellbinders. The labels stamp and sentiment are also Waltzingmouse. I used Color Box shabby pink ink, bundled sage distress ink and Memories black ink. The felt is Papertrey Ink. The rolled roses dies are Die-namics.
"Yeah...cool Greenie. How you doing brother".
Suddenly, despite the fact I was halfway across the street he decided to make his move. To my shock and immediate discomfort he abruptly jerked the wheel and accelerated the red pick-up, slamming on his brakes with his bumper mere inches from my leg! The lady in the car behind him stared open mouthed as I raised my arms in the universally understood sign for WTF!? For his part my would-be assailant merely glared at me and drove off.
Gosh, I am overwhelmed by all your warm reactions! I have checked my blog specifics, because on 4th May 2011 I started with my blog and in almost one year a lot has happened! Hereby some information about my blog:
For those who can't get enough of orphaned postcards, Kate also has an adoption program. Her blog journals her postcard adventures via sites like Postcrossing, Sendsomething and Walltype, too.
When I first started this little blog I wanted to share my favorite recipes with people. Along the way I started posting fewer recipes that I actually used, and tried to come up with unusual dishes, things that I would make once, post about, and never eat again. Eventually I came back around, sharing more of my favorites, and fewer of the one time use recipes. Part of it was because I was discovering so many new favorites, which is a necessity when branching out on a new diet. Sometimes I think I use my blog more than anyone else. It has become my own personal recipe file, and I know what to post about next when I go looking for a recipe on my blog and it's not there.
~Lydia
- Moshi Moshi Music
There's a tornado coming. Gigantic. Majestic. With an utter disregard for the concerns of the bourgeoisie.
I decided to test out a few pairs to see how they do. I listed a pair of Baby Gap tights and a pair of Gymboree tights. One was a pair I had picked up from the Goodwill outlet, the other was a pair that I was going to just giveaway to someone. I listed both pair last month during one of the free or penny promotions and they both sold with multiple bids. I had free shipping on both items, so my profit was a little less, but I still cleared between $2.50 and $3.00 a pair.
and getting an acceptance letter from a lit mag in new york. and confirming my acceptance to concordia, and proof reading an article featuring a photograph of me, modelling. that will also be a billboard and in every public washroom in the city. and planing a vintage sale for this weekend.
I started babysitting at the age of 12. My little neighbor kids, Kenny and Charlie were the most awesome kids ever. They were so full of adventure! I loved them so much. I am Facebook friends with their mom- and when I see pictures of them all grown up and get a little nostalgic. Every time I see 'grown-up' Kenny and Charlie, I can't help but think of making forts with them, and playing play-doh with them, and the first time I drove with them in my car, I got pulled over and Charlie started sobbing and begged the police officer not to arrest their babysitter! He even got some police stickers out of that one. (No, I wasn't speeding with small children in the car.... I had a tail light out..... I didn't get a ticket... and I didn't even get a police sticker. No fair.)
Application: When you are in the wrong, don’t sit around worrying about whose fault it was. Just come back to God. When your family has fallen into sin, do not sit around worrying about whom is most at fault. You do something about it. It might be heartbreaking to see the descent into sin sometimes, but God loves to see the sinner overcome it.
In the last 5149 years of the existence of the Bhagavad Gita, there is no evidence of someone becoming a terrorist after reading it. In fact, Mahatma Gandhi wrote commentaries on the Bhagavad Gita and it was an inspiration for his non-violent movement. The Bhagavad Gita is a unique scripture which caters to the entire range of human evolution, comprising every level of this vast existence.
Meet Trish + Joel.
Reader David Mustoe sent a picture of feline harmony, as well as of a boneless cat. The first photo was labelled “The Peaceable Kingdom” (the title, of course, comes from pictures by the colonial American painter Edward Hicks).
There was a minor avalanche here last weekend. I removed a book from its tower, which reacted by toppling unstoppably against its neighbour, and so on, with results that need hardly be described at length. Luckily there were no casualties: no toes were crushed or bodies buried beneath the tumbling piles, and the books suffered no broken spines or other lasting damage, apart from a torn cover getting torn a little more.
"NEED" those new things you just found online.
"I don't necessarily disagree with you, but please comment on what bands in 1970 were doing different from what bands had done on stage in the late 1960s. That is, please expand upon what you mean by 'concert form.' For example, how do the stacks of Marshall amps used by Hendrix and then Blue Cheer factor in as a suitable setting for the 'oversized' sound. How do other factors, such as costumes, stage props, and stage maneuvers factor in?"
Ecclesiastes 7:9
Jennifer Louise Fialko, 29, Teaneck, N.J.
Hope this New Year brings happiness to all and a prosperous year, and please keep reading my blog, I promise I will try to entertain you all with the very latest in music, movies and technology!
Well, the sun shines brightly today and finally we have clear blue sky. In my earlier post of Marina Bay, the pictures did not turn up so good. Went out today to Fort Canning Park and walked all the way to Marina Bay. Lots of people.
XIV.
here's the lyrics
It is to be noted that this contest was conducted the first time in the history of Saudi Arabia. This action is a part of plan to undermine the foundations of Islam and to corrupt Muslims against the background of the closure of courses on the memorization of the Koran, the banning of Islamic channels and websites, the introduction of a co-education of boys and girls by creating a special University under the patronage of the King, where men and women, who are half-naked in a Western-style, are mixed together, as well as a retraining of imams of the kingdom into a so-called tolerant Islam, acceptable for the West, the promotion of colonization and terror against Muslims around the world.
Even i am getting sick of looking at grainy iPhone pictures.
I’ve been wearing hijab ever since, with one relapse in the summer of 2002. I will not say that it hasn’t been a struggle, especially coming from my background but it’s been a struggle worth fighting for. I take great pride in being a hijabi and having people recognize it not only as a symbol of my faith but also as a symbol of my freedom. It was my choice.
- Size (LxHxD): 15.7″ x 13″ x 7.9″
So much has changed in the neighborhood. Cammareri stopped baking at this location in the 1990's. Many still miss their great bread. Today, movies and TV shows are being filmed in Carroll Gardens all the time, and stars are spotted in Carroll Park.
Finally, someone turned up into the yard and showed me how it all worked and that was that. Easy when you know how.
When we find a fruit that we like, we buy double and freeze some. This is a good thing now, in March, while we are running out of canned foods and there are still a couple of weeks before the markets are back in full swing.
First up is the I Survived the A to Z Blogging Challenge Award, courtesy of Elizabeth Mueller of the Author Elizabeth Mueller blog.
I know, it sounds crazy, but I've done it so many times and it's amazing, listen, I have lots and lots of land to cover, so I need to reach outside the box and I am always trying to use what I have, rather than buy more!
This past weekend I found myself partying halfway across Turkey. Literally. Friday afternoon I went over to a friend's house to, well, wait for my friend to get back from having her hair done. As soon as the girls came back, we were off. First stop...a circumcision party near downtown Ankara. This marks a coming of age in a boy's life and usually takes place between 6 and 12. In this case, the boy was 10 or 12 (I kept getting different answers). He's been battling cancer for a while and had to wait until the upper end of the age range for his party (an presumably circumcision, although I never did have the guts to ask).
Pontian Wantan Noodles Lot 5, 3rd Floor, Sungai Wang Plaza Jalan Bukit Bintang, 55100, Kuala Lumpur
This is the ceiling after scraping and marking out the studs with blue chalk lines...
Heeeeellllllooooooo Blog Readers!!! :) Well, it is pretty much confirmed Chris and Lottie are either together or going to be together. EVERYONE THINKS SO!!! :/ Gemma was with them on the bus this morning, and they were holding hands, Luca says they’ve been close for a few weeks, Tom thinks they are, even Elliott from the bus thinks they are together!!! :/ It’s such a shame, as she could do so much better. She is very pretty, and I mean VERY pretty. I wouldn’t ask her out myself, mostly because I know she is way out of my league, but if they opportunity arose to go out with her I definitely would not turn it down :) But still, her and Chris are just so different. She’s all sweet and nice, and he’s just sort of… not. No one saw them coming I don’t think.
Remember, we still have opportunities each week to win a $10 gift certificate on your next Waltzingmouse Stamps order. A lucky winner (we call them our BIG CHEESE) receives this gift and all they had to do to earn this credit was to upload their Waltzingmouse Stamps projects into the WMS Gallery. Are you a BIG CHEESE? We have dedicated a special thread in the Waltzingmouse Forum (under ‘The Gallery’ topic) where you can let us know when you have uploaded a project to the WMS Gallery. One lucky BIG CHEESE selected from those gallery uploads will receive a promotional code giving them $10 off their next purchase from Waltzingmouse Stamps. In addition they will have their BIG CHEESE project posted in a special BIG CHEESE album in the WMS gallery for all to see and adore. Since you are creating wonderful WMS projects anyway, why not increase your chance of winning an extra special treat.
Can you say: He renews my strength?
The official line of the Syrian government is that all the unrest is being caused by Western and Israeli agents and that it’s all a plot to hurt the Arab world.
Then with summer on my mind, I had a browse through the swimwear as I have officially decided it is high time I introduced more one pieces into my swimwear collection in the absence of an Elle McPherson bikini bod and naturally a striped bandeau style caught my eye. Now you don't need to be a stylist to know that an apple body shape like myself should never wear a stripey swimsuit and if you came to me for style advice, as many of you have, I would not be pointing you in the direction of this candy coloured beauty, but you know I am a sucker for stripes and the cut out detail on the back is so cute, disregarding any weirdo tan lines you may get whilst sunning yourself in it, but what the heck, it will probably be returned but it does have body shaper tummy control so that will help right?
There are so many books I want to read now that I don't tend to read books for pleasure more than once. I have read many children's books over and over because that is how I share my love of books with kids. I have probably read Charlotte's Web over 25 times!
and because our existing coffee table had two glass panels on top we decided that we couldn't ignore the coffee table quest for much longer.
My most recent post on my kitchen has been disappearing or partially disappearing for some reason
Duchamp painted a wonderful window into the chess realm of Sophia Venus and as he did so she shed further her garments in her escape from the feudal halls of time, through the various window lattices and portols, which had been unclocked by the master key maker. Here is one called the Portrait de joueurs d’échecs 1911, where we see the multiple trails of a dual androgynous union of conjugal blessedness shining through, high up on one level congealing as a chess game unifies in the cerebal heights, and down below the taking form as the child of the union of the opposites, but there are various alternatives and angles receeding towards and away from that and figures looking each and everyway despite the perception of centrality. But there is also a side union to the left.
I did my race last Saturday---I came in fourth in my age group---missed third by 14 seconds and second my 21 seconds----I should have eaten my wheaties! It was a bad hair day!
Reeces Peanut butter cups
Mix ingredients except for the 151 in a shaker with ice. Pour into glass, fill with orange juice, and top with the high-proof rum.
Hypostatic Union: the doctrine that in Jesus there are two distinct natures, divine and human, in the one person. First formally accepted at Chalcedon in 451.
Actually, as an appendix to the report shows, Forest City Ratner's contract went up, a 17.5% increase from $656,520. (Overall lobbying by FCR, however, decreased 45% from $2,105,141 to $1,160,186.)
We've been asked to publish the artist's sketch of the suspect in an abduction/robbery that occurred recently on the UNA campus. Readers who have contacted us have feared the suspect's crime was cut short in some manner and his victim was lucky to escape.
the moon floating palely over the bay.
In the last 5 years, 10 years, 15 years….have you gotten the impression that anything new or different is done about how Police treat with sex crimes? Is not a month ago a woman turned up naked at a Police Station, an alleged victim of rape, and the Police refused to take her report? This is not the same Police that beating crowd like they beating pan?
So you see, you can drink just about any beer and make it fit the criteria for MovemBEER. Send your best efforts to me and the best one, as judged by me, will win a signed copy of The Critics Choice - Australia's Best Beers.
Last week has been hectic here in Montreal with student protests every single night, most of them. For those of you out there who called us “spoiled brats who want everything for free” let me remind you this : Here in Quebec we pay AT LEAST 40% income tax, I wonder what reaction that would get from the Tea Party. Anyways… Like a lot of young, urban (?!?) people, I watched it online live from CUTV (as my daughter was asleep) and I would like to thank them for the coverage since I couldn’t be there myself.
Confucianism, a Chinese tradition with more than 2000 years of history, emphasizes education. Education is more than just getting your a well-paid job. It’s about building your soft and hard skills. If your whole objective is to get a degree and get a job, you will be doomed because you are not aware of how important life-long learning is. The most important skills, on top of the hard technical skills, one should take it with them from a degree are critical analytical, problem solving and self-learning skills. With these skills, you know where to get help, when to get help and how to get help. Without these skills, you are worse than a robot with good A.I. real soon!
Up yer fanny! (Or emmmm bumhole. Or whatever arrangement you've got going on 'down there')
Social media are an extremely powerful tool. I’m sure you’ve heard stories of individuals winning battles with world’s biggest companies on Facebook. You can use some of its power to advertise your events. It makes spreading the word really easy, allowing your friends and your friends friends sending invitations to whoever they know and letting them know of your gig.
“Vegetarian Restaurants” are not usually the sort of fodder for this blog. I mean, I’m a meat eater, and I rarely make a meal of 100 percent vegetable protein (although the occasional Felafel sandwich and Eggplant Parmigiana or Indian vegetable curry or dhosa has been known to cross my bow). When I have vegetables, its usually as a compliment to some sort of preparation of tasty animals. So when I pass a “vegetarian” restaurant, the idea of eating some new-age, raw food, tree-hugger vegan garbage usually causes me to go running and screaming.
Not only did I try a different style...but I used the dreaded purple! LOL! Ok, I don't dislike all shades of purple...just most of them! hehe! All in all I think turned out alright...
Indivisible participation: History and memory, two sides of reality for all of us, are exquisitely mixed — there is no separating them. Michael, while recalling his aunts and the specific summer of his 7th year, can’t tease these realities apart any more than you or I can. So, in telling this particular story to us, he is unable to simply stand apart as an impartial observer.
So we've been doing some redecorating lately. It's a slow process, and as you can see I'm not in any hurry. Normally when I redo a room it's a crazy rush. But not the this time. Good old Paxil.
The man managed to escape but was later caught by a security guard. - Sapa
It was a day of limited running for Sahara Force India as the team worked hard to get on top of reliability issues. Despite only completing 14 laps, Paul Di Resta was able to gather some aero data to begin evaluation of the latest developments on the car.
Query: alaska, when to give up on perennials
So everyone enjoy your holiday weekend, be safe, drink responsibly, and If you can get your hands on a bottle of Pool Vodka, make yourself a PoolSide and enjoy one of the last few weekends of warm weather!!
It didn’t recognize my face,
Galaxy S2 – Possibly slow Performance (need to find test device)
Yeah, okay, as revelations go it's not exactly Earth-shattering, but still.
~CC
W1: But what about socialization? Aren't you worried about them being cooped up all day with kids their own ages, never getting the opportunity for natural relationships?
Then I ate it all with my feet up on the couch, watching some terrible commercial tv show (we only watch SBS at his place). If I dropped some mash on my belly, I ate it right up. Then I clipped my toenails.
Then I hid me close to the reedy tarn,
1/2 tbsp. capers, drained (yuck! I didn't add these)
It is very disappointing that the University has made this decision. The University of Texas has the stature, funding, reputation, and experience necessary to attract researchers and faculty needed to continue and build the Accessibility Institute. All that the University’s administration seems to lack is the interest.
After being on the ship since early Sunday afternoon, we were anxious to get off and check out Puerto Vallarta on Wednesday. We got into port fairly early. I went for a run that morning (2nd of the trip...I've never exercised on vacation before, but that's for another post!) and then we took our time getting ready and getting off the ship. This was our longest day we had in port (12 or so hours), so we weren't in a rush. We had planned a sunset cruise that left around 4, so we set off on our own. We walked around the downtown area and did some shopping, site-seeing and eating!
Do I hope to make a difference in the lives of these girls? Every day.
In infants, lung function testing requires sedation so the child sleeps and is passive during the test. This allows the infant PFT equipment to perform testing since the child is not old enough to cooperate with PFTs. Infant PFTs can be performed very early in life until about 2 to 4 year of age depending on the equipment and size of the child.
Born in Dublin to an Irish mother and a father who immigrated to Ireland from Zambia, Samantha Mumba enjoyed tremendous success during the years of 2000-2002 as one of world's most popular female pop singers. With an album that went Platinum and several very popular videos where she danced and sang and otherwise put herself on display, she was certainly the cause of the Gujarat earthquake in January of 2001.
PM’s Office Minister in charge of shutting down media, Sathit Wongnongtoey, said: “The … authorities needed to suspend the broadcasts because the content contained distorted facts and was aimed at inciting unrest.” No evidence provided. At the same time, as the Thai Journalists’ Association has pointed out, “the government continued to use state-owned radio and TV station to present one-sided information. The government also allowed other radio stations and another satellite TV to present similar content of state media, which could lead to further rifts in the society. This could lead to criticism that the government was using double standard law enforcement.”
I've been making some new garments last weekend which I couldn't find in stores. This minimalistic leather boxy top with a Céline feel and a Calvin Klein neckline was one of them and was incredibly easy to make. Here are the instructions!
If the idea of EU citizenship was promoted more at a local (member state) level would we see an increase in pro-EU sentiment? Should member state governments do more to make their electorate pro-EU?
_____totally ignored ... actually cuz i'm new here ... and that's how new comers are welcomed nowadays
But what at the end of the day, after all this toss I’ve read, what do I think is good for cooking lager appreciation and the availability of cheap lout? Or even pubs and pongy beer? Your guess is as good as mine. I suspect it’s more to do with the prosperity and economic wellbeing of the larger population than tax or duty rates or allowing dumb people who don’t properly consider the contract they are signing to get out of the tied supply contracts they’ve freely signed up to, or even dumb schemes to bung my taxes at mug punters so they can piss their life savings away buying failed pubs they are not going to manage to turn into successful enterprises in a month of Sundays. Roll on May 5h. The day it’s all over and we can get back to proper news, like for instance what Jordan or Kerry Katona have been up to recently.
tony
The 2012 national presidential campaign has officially begun. It began last night with the president’s third State of the Union address. The president used language from his 2008 campaign, through the year-long healthcare debate, through the debt ceiling fight, as well as presented some new ideas that are blueprints for his 2012 campaign strategy.
To round out that theme, Everyman’s wife gets pissed off at her husband’s electronic tryst, and makes a beeline for the adjacent menswear section, intent on buying him a new shirt just because she knows he doesn’t want one.
Do you have a suggestion for our visit to the Loire Valley or know of an interesting idea for travel abroad? I would love to hear about it!
And the old man is calling his sheep from the point on a table where the kitchen fork etched a circle
What do you find most appealing about Leonor Grayl’s men’s product line?
Now, Darth Diocletian is known for a lot of good things, but he was also a real prick when it came to persecuting Christians in the empire. In fact, recent archaeological discoveries point toward Diocletian secretly building a powerful weapon that he could use to wipe out the Christians in a single, all-powerful stoke.
After all these years imagine I still know the theme song! How mad/sad is that lol B)
Her doctor repeated the question, “Where does it hurt?”
You can actually SEE the fat on it. My photo illustrates it poorly (here's a good one), but there's a large chunk of YELLOW jelly-like goo on top of the slices. (I'm shuddering just thinking about it.) But this is actually normal. It's supposed wear its fat on the outside. It's proud of its curves. Me? I'm imagining those tiny jaune globules making their way to my thighs every time I take a bite.
Sometimes, as a PR professional, all it takes is a single piece of press coverage to make your day/week/year. We’re a pretty passionate bunch so a great piece of coverage can result in a whole office full of PR types whooping and cheering.
“Our grown rubber trees should have helped many families out of poverty by now. Is this not what the government wants?
-Spoon into a greased 8″ cake pan. At this point I did sprinkle my cake with some of the brown sugar-cinnamon mix I had left over from my Cinnamon Roll Waffles.
Plotting and scheming
An addendum. I’m going to do something that will shock and disturb. I’m going to say congratulations to the Guardian for opening up the First Book Awards to *all* books, however published. Fantastic. I really hope they follow through by offering reviews of the merits of the books readers suggested.
“Would you be quiet for once? Krysta is finally asleep. If you wake her up, I swear to all things holy that I’m going to shove that hammer so far up your—“
Pop-up: Sigh… I don’t really feel like it…
After some soul searching, and a lot of deliberating with the special few who knew who I was, I decided it was time to go mainstream. It was time to go PUBLIC!
Place the diced pork into a large bowl and pour half of the marinade over it. Reserve the other half.
definition defines meaningless
The new pact also calls for a study on how the Fire Department provides ambulance service. So far, response times are too slow and paramedics are burdened with calls, thanks to an old-fashioned deployment model worked out by a fire-centric leadership.
Bonjour à toutes! Nous y voici, c'est le moment des nouveautés chez All That Scraps! Et pour celles et ceux qui se posent la question, non, je n'ai pas perdu mes Copics, ils seront de retour dès demain:-)! Aujourd'hui, nous vous montrons les nouveaux tampons CC Designs de la gamme des Swiss Pixies, faites-moi confiance, vous allez les adorer!
Constipation is an irregularity condition of the human digestive system. This is characterized by slow vowel movement, due to the vowels’ lack of capacity to hold water. And recently, studies were made to prove this fact. One of them is noted below.
Here are a few visuals to sooth your curiousity....enjoy!
a tug of hurt in my heart-
Do Kelly’s tasks: I did these for a long time, then changed my email system, so all my Flylady emails get moved to their own folder and marked as read. This meant I never went in to read them, and stopped doing the tasks.
My initial impression is that the flavor is a bit thin for what seems to be trying for a rich heaviness. It just seems like there ought to be more going on here. I decided to let it warm a bit, which helped. Some caramel notes come out. Toast. Strong hops. A bit of sweet fruit hiding deep within. Still, it just feels like something is missing.
Extended flashbacks.
Out of the ashes of Auschwitz and Treblinka, something amazing has happened, a miracle in our own time.
Getting out of the car, I felt like an animal, ready to go, head and nose towards the sky and sun, snorting the familiar air and smells of tar and salt, my eyes taking in all the old and the changes.
- Destruction of all blasphemous cartoons of Adolf Hitler(pbuh) produced in the Second World War.
We blush a bit now at the presumptions of some of our early “Come Away” ministries – four-day weeks of small group outreach to pastors and their spouses. We were encouraged as we watched their tensions lessen and their tired faces reflect some easement of their ministry stress. But we did not know by personal experience the feelings of defeat and futility that pastors and their spouses often felt over their local church ministries. We now know it firsthand.
Over the course of 8 weeks we have been working once a week with members of this community and we will be performing our piece with them. We’ve explored everything from their own experiences to what they feel the stigma towards this situation is (if any). Looking at the idea of Elephant in the room the whole time. Has there been a time when you’ve ignored the situation at hand and pretended everything was fine? Has there been a time when someone asked about what was going on and you lied? This is how you can help.
There were a few (rather bitter) remarks from some (presumably older) tangueras some time ago, about leaders who'd rather dance with the "young & pretty" women, even though they are less skilled then themselves. They of course attributed that to the male hormones.
I die cut a mat with Spellbinders labels 25 from the Taco Bell box we had for dinner tonight,I embossed it with a Sizzix embossing folder.I then die cut a smaller mat from a piece of corrugated cardboard.I then edged them with a sponge dabber and Tim Holt Tea Dye distress ink to bring out the texture. I did the same thing with a even smaller one also embossing it and inking it. I Stamped the Best Wishes ( Raisin Boat Stamp) with versamark ink and embossed it with a copper embossing powder and edging it with ink.
an egg white and some Black Cumin for covering of the rolls
1 Cup Home Made Beef Broth (Optional)***
This lady also told me that she used to hold one arm up to the child (metaphorically) so the child wouldn’t get to close to her heart, while with the other arm holding the child close. It was her way to manipulate her feelings so if the baby was taken away, she wouldn’t be as hurt. But she said after doing that with the first few, she felt God very strongly telling her to STOP IT. To love that child like you would if he was your own and if he doesn’t stay, then God will supply the comfort and grace at that time. But to stop trying to manipulate her own feelings and to trust HIM!
The 1936 Marconi type–702 television - which was originally bought for £100 - had been expected to sell for £5,000 when it was auctioned by Bonhams.
The Timex Ironman Watch was released in 1986 and has become the best selling sports watch in history. Today there are a wide variety of Ironman watches that cater to athletes of all levels. Timex have recently updated their website and have ordered their Ironman timepieces into discrete categories. Here is a brief summary of the various Timex Ironman Watches collections.
Let’s fix this for Larry, straight away, shall we?
His colourful persona, quirky videos and bashing lyrics – many a times aimed at the bull’s -eye he confidently paints on his own chest – make the perception that he’s a bit goofy and not really all that serious about life and music -a natural human error.
Why would we ever hold tight to a disease that destroys us?
On me.
“I’m sorry about all this,” I said quietly.
Chrome-ringed dials, an uprated information system, better quality ventilation controls and the new saab 9 2x of high-riding all-wheel-drive estates raise questions for buyers about whether a full-blown SUV is really necessary and without an SUV of its appeal is also simply the saab 9 2x sales of its development, the saab 9 2x pictures as it looked good.
But in the now.
People are always hungry (for salt, sugar and fat) and people always have an array of feelings and psychological states. But these are secondary elements of human existence – meant to be balanced, made whole and subservient to our greater life. Consumer societies will never be happy, stable, or healthy. Their happiness and stability can be managed by those who have the power of propaganda. By themselves, they will never create a healthy civilization.
Sail On
The conifer never stopped growing- and eventually it became too hard to wrestle yourself out of the car if you wanted to get into the house.
Thinks forward. Fine and strong clairvoyance. Being able to foresee things a little ahead is like having Jedi senses. Helps when looking after small children, a bipolar husband or shooting a film. Also very convenient to be married to another Scorpio who reads my mind like I read his. Reduces arguments like you wouldn't believe.
The show closed with a cheeky sashay down the runway from a gorgeous burlesque dancer, and was followed by drinks, music and mini desserts served by retro usherettes. I wish we could have stayed longer as I had such a fun evening!
I always prefer organic vegetables when available and if they are local, even better. If the potatoes are organic, I tend to leave the skins on. Even for the yams, although not for this recipe. Carrots I tend to peel as it reveals the beautiful color underneath. I have not come across organic parsnips too often, but nevertheless I would probably peel them as well. The same would apply for the pear.
Electoral reform movement Bersih then announced it would hold a third rally for free and fair elections on April 28.
Despite my difficulty in rolling anything higher than a 1, I quite like the Chaos Pact team. It's not the greatest for sure, but it has a lot of potential, with three big guys and all the skill access. It would be fun if we had longer leagues or brought teams back for multiple seasons to see what the team would be like with some more development.
So much has been said about Selangor DAP elected representatives and even State Excos being involved with the Lords of the Underworld Vices. These accusations were not made by BN Leaders but came from PKR elected representatives, who are DAP cohorts and ‘strange bedfellow’s partners in the ‘marriage of incovenience’ and an ‘unholy union’.
District 12 (Smithville, and most of Kearney): The word is Smithville Police Chief Ken Wilson will be running for this new district.
The only advantage I see to having already learned another language is that I know how I learn best. One thing I found that really helped me strengthen my ear for Spanish was watching telenovelas. I can't say that I know enough yet to strengthen anything in German, but I'm learning a lot watching a German telenovela. Yes, the Germans have telenovelas, and they follow the same format as their Latin American counterparts: boy meets girl, but then boy loses girl many times thanks to some terrible/meddlesome people and unfortunate circumstances. However, in the end (and there is always an end), the bad guys get what is coming to them, and the good guys live happily ever after. FIN.
Tent flysheet and inner
Read this article about the young bullying Mitt Romney. Of couse I know I'm not going to win over any of the die hard conservative, right wing tea baggers because they have their horse blinders on and hate Obama
Curiously enough God still loves atheists, despite their utterly insufferable blindness.
There’s also the mechanization of our food industry. Milk from Cows whose diets consist of grain cannot sustain baby Calves. More genetically modified foods are popping into the market.
So that is the week in review. I didn’t take many pictures but here is what I have.
Now this one does have two implications. One the player knows that their character is going to rush in before a plan is formed or before it is even fully understood what the party is facing (which could have the potential of frustrating players- more on this in a moment). If the character survives, in comes the second implication: Player Conflict.
I’ll just add that if they could trick me into being that deeply in love with someone I thought I saw in a deli for 45 seconds, then how hard do you think it will be to do that on a massive scale with someone who has a lot of media exposure? I would point to some of the very odd (bordering on pornographic) statements made by conservative fans of Sarah Palin, but I found them difficult to take seriously.
Same goes for true love.
Deirdre was the daughter of the royal storyteller Fedlimid mac Daill. Before she was born, Cathbad the chief druid at the court of Conchobar mac Nessa, king of Ulster, prophesied that Fedlimid's daughter would grow up to be very beautiful, but that kings and lords would go to war over her, much blood would be shed because of her, and Ulster's three greatest warriors would be forced into exile for her sake. Hearing this, many urged Fedlimid to kill the baby at birth, but Conchobar, aroused by the description of her future beauty, decided to keep the child for himself. He took Deirdre away from her family and had her brought up in seclusion by Leabharcham, an old woman, and planned to marry her when she was old enough. Deirdre grew up, and one day told Leabharcham that she would love a man with hair the color of the raven, skin as white as snow, and lips as red as blood. Leabharcham told her she knew of such a man-- Naoise, a handsome young warrior, hunter and singer at Conchobar's court. With the collusion of Leabharcham, Deirdre met Naoise. At first the young man wanted nothing to do with her, because it was known that she was destined for the king. But Deirdre shamed him into eloping with her. Accompanied by his fiercely loyal brothers Ardan and Ainnle, the sons of Uisnech, they fled to Scotland. For a while, they lived a happy life there, hunting and fishing and living in beautiful places; one place associated with them is Loch Etive. But the furious, humiliated Conchobar tracked them down.
I intend for both blogs to be kept in their very own blogspheres but for one day only I am sharing the same post.
Other midwives might want to offer an opinion on this.
Zane rolled towards her, still supporting his weight on his elbow. He eased Isabelle to the ground smoothly. Sliding his free hand from her face, trailing down her neck, and brushing against her breast. Hardened buds formed as the back of his hand brushed against them. Zane’s hand continued down to her waist, then reached around and pulled himself against her. A low growl escaped Zane’s throat a second before he covered her mouth again. It started gentle then grew more insistent, stirring feelings that quickly turned to raw desire. A slow sweep of his tongue in her mouth sent her closer to that ragged edge.
Perales: The very first paper I wrote on Smeltertown was for a class on the American West in 1995. Of course not all of my coursework was directly related to Smeltertown research, but it has been with me for the better part of 15 years.
First Sketch Prize...This is the Prize for the winner voted on by the Design Team for October's challenge...and don't forget there will be 2 random drawings for 2 more lucky winners and you know Pam won't disappoint with those 2 prizes either...So let's get this Contest started!!!
“Cry aloud, for he is a god; either he is meditating, or he is busy, or he is on a journey, or perhaps he is sleeping and must be awakened.”
Embodying GOREZONE's style (almost single-handedly) was Chas. Balun. A writer who inspired many but remains unmatched by any, Balun practiced a more gonzo brand of genre journalism, creating a niche all his own with self-published books of reviews like The Connoisseur's Guide to The Contemporary Horror Film (1983). Although he had contributed to Fango, it wasn't until his "Piece O' Mind" column in GOREZONE that he really reached his apex. It's no exaggeration to say that Piece O' Mind changed the way many horror fans felt about the genre - or more specifically, it validated the way they felt about it and articulated that passion in a revolutionary way.
"A new television show that generates a lot of online buzz before it airs won't necessarily draw a host of viewers, according to a new study, which found little or no correlation between the amount of such buzz and the size of the audience that ultimately tunes in. The study, by ad-buying firm Optimedia US, one of the first to examine the issue, raises questions about the effectiveness of social media as a promotional tool for TV."The study measured social media chatter about new TV shows. It included Twitter mentions, Facebook "likes," and Google searches, as well as Klout scores. In addition to finding no correlation between online buzz and real world success, the Journal also reported...
1/19/2012: Well I found that I could make it through one more day of spanking: only one more to go. It wasn't too bad tonight. The bathbrush she was using broke early on so she had to stop and get up to get a new instrument to beat my ass with..........I think that took a little wind out of her sails. Thank God!!! I posted a picture of my ass from tonight's beating. Of course, to be honest, that is the culmination of the week so far.
Overall, as an “intro” to sci-fi this novel was a good pick. There’s nothing overly complex about the ship’s system, the characters were fairly fleshed out, and the plot was fast moving. Is it a book for everyone? No. But it was right for me, and I really think if it even sounds remotely good to you, you should give it a chance. I certainly look forward to the second novel to see how both the novel and the author grow.
Please never call me sweetie or hon. Because I don’t want to go to jail for your disappearance. Ahem. Sorry, I just don’t like terms of affection in general, but especially when the speaker is a stranger. I know Mr. or Ms. or Ma’am seem overly formal, but I’m not sure why that’s a bad thing.
She pulled herself out of the hay and looked behind her. To her astonishment there was a small, old stone cottage with a thatched roof that seemed familiar to Alice with smoke puffing out of its chimney. Alice turned to pick up her red cloak from the haystack.
the sun is gone, the sky is nowhere, and of all
Him: I threw out the two bags of trash in the garage and I dropped the third bag at Goodwill! (With a huge smile, because he had done something "extra")
Several area politicians in response to growing concern that the billionaire developer of the proposed Atlantic Yards Stadium project could get his hands on some Obama stimulus dollars have sent a letter to Governor Patterson excerpted below:
I made a small pool of crème anglaise, then placed one of the meringues in the center. I had to gently remove each merinuge from its foil cup wrapper and allow the goop to drip off before inverting it onto the dish. I bypassyed the step of using a round cutter to make it more of a cylinder instead of the shape of the cupcake liner I made them in. I'd gotten this far and was pleased with the results, I didn't want to risk the meringues imploding or falling apart during that step. Because you know that totally would have happened, and I am sick and tired of sucking at desserts, so I kept on going with what I knew I could do for a first-timer.
You know, give her a sincere compliment – tell her you like her outfit, tell her how well-mannered her kids are, or tell her what a great job she’s been doing in general. And, if she does something that makes you want to pass judgment, DON’T! Bite your tongue, take a deep breath, and realize that the things other people do, in the grand scheme of things, have NO effect on your life UNLESS YOU ALLOW THEM TO!
Working with a stand mixer, preferably fitted with a paddle attachment, or with a hand mixer in a large bowl, beat the butter on medium speed until soft and creamy. Add both sugars, the salt and vanilla extract and beat for 2 minutes more.
This was a baby carriage fruit tray with a fruit baby. The baby head kind of creeped me out at first. But the fresh fruit and the fruit dip were quite delish. I could honestly just sit all day and scoop fruit dip into my mouth.
If you do a quick internet search for your area, you can probably find a list of flowers that will bring your flower garden to life. These usually only require work in the planting stage – after that, the flower take care of themselves. The only downside to this is that you don’t have any product to show for it.
f) What do you do to relax after a bad day?
Me encanto Latinoamerica.
You don't know, You don't know you're beautiful,
P&L -4
The Spring Cask Pilsner was such a gentle waft of spring breeze across the palate that that it got me thinking. Last night, I drank a Kernel Brewery Double Citra, so full of mangoes and passion fruit that its 9%+ abv slipped by unnoticed. It was the concentrated fruity essence of a hop that has been bred to be the concentrated fruity essence of hops. Have my doors of lupulin perception been pushed permanently ajar by the repeated ingestion of Double Citra, Double IPA, Imperial Black Ale? And more importantly, if they are, should I even care, or should I just yield to it and accept that the past is a different country, and things are going to be different from now on?
There is no other reason why I would wear this sweater other than it remains underneath a coat and it is the warmest item of clothing I own.
Susan Harris (REP) 5.99% 212
Another great trick is to store your washing and cleaning water in your emptied out laundry detergent containers. Don't rinse them out, just fill them up with water and store them on the shelf (mark them as water or you may make the mistake as we have before and used water suds in our washing instead of soap--oops!)
To get just a small idea of God’s creative power, let us consider our corner of the universe. We live on one of nine planets that revolve around the sun. As the dominant light of our solar system, our sun gives off far more energy in one second than all mankind has produced since creation. With a diameter of approximately 860,000 miles, the sun could hold one million planets the size of the Earth. Yet our sun is only an average-size star.
There goes my imagination. I'll be sure to give you another update later in the week, so stay tuned.
mourns a bride
And we have more coming our way!
The other day, I was in the grocery store. It was stupid.
until he passes by;
~ Walk On (Motherjane)
And I am a broken record, yes, but taking a minute to make part of your organizing project just a little glam, will really motivate you to keep it that way going forward! IHeart it!
the fence and like that old
...but... the nagging doubts...
As is common, Paul’s tone for the entire letter seems to be overflowing as he recounts the budding virtues of faith, love and hope (vv. 2-3). Not only that, but the whole of the Macedonian and Achaian region witnessed the power of God in their lives. Paul states matter of factly that the veracity of his gospel is proven, not in the spoken word only, but in power and in the Holy Spirit. It is probable that due to the troubling outcome of his clash with the Athenian philosophers (Acts 17:16-34) he was seeking to remind them of the manner in which they received the gospel knowing that it is this distinctive that will sustain them through troubled times (1 Cor. 1:18-2:16).
In a small table, together with some of my close high school friends, were empty bottles of whiskey and vodka hence the bantering and reminiscing of the good old high school days. Certain songs played by the DJ reminded us of our crazy memories in places that are merely substantial to those who grew up in the 90′s. We came to realize how fast time flew. At this age or point of my time, weddings and christenings seem to be of customary and yet inside my head, I always wonder how surreal it is to be jumping from a life we all once led as kids to a life with legally bonded relationships, responsibilities, and more.
I had hoped you'd see my face and that you'd be reminded
The younger children (ages 5-9) had a blast putting them together, and then eating them.
May’s neighbours have agreed to meet up the next day to see if the weather report shows if the swelling enters the eye of a storm or not.
They hand-selected about 22 of us to bring out to their headquarters, meet each other, show us around the World of Coke, learn more about their live positively philosophy and how to better build my own brand.
Goods and services from China accounted for only 2.7% of US personal consumption spending in 2010, according to the report, The US Content of “Made in China.” About 88.5% of US spending last year was on goods made here. …
Psycho and Peeping Tom were released in 1960 and the two films are remarkably similar in their examination of psychologically disturbed characters. Although both films are now considered important entries in the horror genre, Psycho was tolerated by the critical establishment while Peeping Tom was not and the failure of the film critically and financially ended director Michael Powell's career.
* Model what works. Examples help visualize and specify and provide someone to contact to share experiences with.
A friend with an impressive race record confessed that she’s not a good runner. She explained that if she was, then she wouldn’t have suffered countless, prolonged injuries throughout her running life. If I interpret that correctly, it’s to mean that a good runner should not only be concerned about speed, but he or she must also know how to avoid drills that damage the body. I can’t agree more, but it’s always easier said than done. And do I consider myself a good runner? Definitely not.
Since we were now in April and therefore open enrollment for the husband's policy, and since his GP and specialist co-pays are half mine on BCBS, and since he seems to have excellent Rx co-pays, I figured, "Hey, why not enroll as a spouse? We'll finally be on the same insurance. How easy." I even remembered to double check with the agent that the plan did, in fact, provide maternity benefits.
IBU 100 (estimated from recipe calculator, nowhere near this amount)
The morning Sheri and I left the motel room we were surprised to see many of those same navy officers standing out in the parking lot looking up and pointing at something taking place in the sky. The expression of utter shock on their faces was enough to penetrate my neatly self-absorbed world. Wanting to know what was going on we quickly joined them in the parking lot.
i have
9. Danny Boy - Erich Kunzel-Cincinnati Pops Orch. w/ John McDermott
However, eggplant is really nice and easy to cook. For those without joints problem, I guess it should be ok to eat egg plants!
Only you can comfort me, giving me peace where e’er I go.
As for Cuba opening up, I seriously doubt that. Maybe when the gulags are opened, free speech and homosexuality are allowed, when dissidents are freed then I will believe that Cuba is opening up. Oh and free elections as well.
My state esthetician license. See? I told you it was bad. In my defense, it was 7:30 in the morning and I was a nervous wreck because they take your picture before you even take the test. I have no idea why my nose looks way more massive than it really is. Or why I look like I have chipmunk teeth. Or really why it's just the worst picture in the history of the world. Seriously. Yuck.
it was a yoke to be lifted.
Matt, Ranae, and Bobo walk in from the back and stood on their spots. Matt did the intro and after they all talked a bit about themselves, the stories began. A couple of young boys started off, a father and son, and soon others followed. They didn't want us taking pictures while the show was being taped, so in between I snapped a couple here and there. Some of our friends had fascinating stories along with others in the building. There was one lady who insisted she was a fairy and that Bigfoot was a Hobgoblin. She went on to tell us that we will never see a Bigfoot or rather Hobgoblin, and get photos or video of one. Bobo mentioned the Patterson/Gimlim film of the female Bigfoot but she said that was a Hobgoblin. Bobo said, "Oh well, I guess they caught a Hobgobin and not Bigfoot". They let her finish her story and did ask her some questions. As you can see the stories varied with some sounding legit and others a bit like they were made up.
Despite my athletic retardation, our team is doing relatively well and have one week left until the playoffs, so shit is about to get real. One thing is for sure Aiming for the Fat One (team name) is not going down without a fight!
Dokyo : Lyrics are very important parts. But I don't think we gotta force lyrics to all kids. I usually write lyrics for 13Steps. And I don't think everybody can agree with my idea about anything that I write because the thoughts people have are different. Well, I think I can say it's just like looking up some person's diary. Still I will be happy if people catch my ideas and got something in common though. Especially on this new album, I think there will be many people who can agree with my ideas because I wrote lyrics for this album about politics and social issues.
Rel gave a silent curse. "Why don't you explain, if it matters so much?"
CAMERA PANS TO A CLOSE-UP.
Directly opposite is the sitting room. The distinctive characteristic of this apartment is it’s the northeast corner filled with a single sheet of semi circular beveled plate glass six by seven feet in dimension and flanked by two square plate glass windows of smaller size. This unique feature of Cheyenne’s r residence architecture produces an admirable effect. It may be mentioned here that each apartment, so far as its furnishing is concerned, is an artistic study distinct from any other apartment. The prevailing tint in the sitting room is gray blue. The carpets, drapery and wall paper partake of this tint. The woodwork is in antique oak, and the fireplace of plastic work with exquisite panels in bronze.
I'll be giving a short paper entitled "Digitising Leicester Kyle," on the process of posting Leicester Kyle’s long poem Koroneho in cyberspace, on Friday morning.
Did we miss the boat on that this year?
EUROTRASH THUG
through the years and, with the slightest touch, will comfort you like
There’s a great mashup of San Francisco crime thrillers available online – it includes chunks from more recent films like the crass but scrumptiously-looking Basic Instinct, an hommage to Vertigo, as well as the rather more impressive Zodiac and The Game, both paranoid thrillers directed by David Fincher, but otherwise includes clips from all the films on my list minus two – can you spot which ones are missing? The YouTube page does in fact list most of the films the clips are taken from (but there are also segments uncredited, like those featuring Claire Trevor from Robert Wise’s Born to Kill (1947)). For the YouTube page, see: San Francisco is the Scene of a Perfect Crime
So much has happened with my new found love of writing over the last two years, that I figured I should have a place to put all the wandering thoughts in my head. (And, hey, it's writing.)
Tomorrow at 4 am, the entire Shallow family will head off to the airport for the 5 hour flight to Panama, followed by a 2 hour flight to Managua followed by a 3 hour drive to fulfill my almost sixteen-month-long dream of going to Nicaragua.
Delete Pink Circle layer
4 cups powdered sugar
4. Do you use an in-house AV company or is there an outside company that holds the contract?
What kind of wine can you buy for £2.65? Well, you probably can find one but would you serve it to your friends? This upmarket cider, on the other hand, would look good on any table.
you know this dress rehearsal rag,
Yes, some people have what it takes to see things that most other mere mortals miss. Not only can they see it, but they have a belief that their visions will be realized when most of the rest of us say it just couldn’t happen.
Service Drive processes vary from dealership to dealership throughout the country.
Shall not dissemble their surprise
feint of heart. You'll be disgusted early on when you learn of the lengths to which Rex will go to to ensure the survival of his family. You'll be even more disgusted when you find out his secrets. I don't want to give away specifics, but let's just say cannibalism is not out of the question for him.
Ginger-garlic -1 tbsp(chopped finely)
“So?” I eventually said. “It doesn’t make them any less guilty, does it?”
“So Mama would call you ‘Snickers.’ And my vote’s for ‘Alice.’ What say you, Pumpkin?”
Added some faux stitching to the pattern paper.
I’d also like to thank those who have made donations to help defray our costs. Unfortunately, said donations do not help enough, and as a result sometime soon we’ll be adding in some Google Ads. We’re going to try and keep it minimal, and if donations continue to come in . . . well, we’ll see.
Knowing your district is VITAL to succesful fireground operations. You may be the best hose stretcher, tactical officer, and firefighter around but if you do not get there all of those skills are for nothing. However knowing your district is not enough, you have to be very familiar with your second, third, and maybe even 4th due!
I doubt we are in a bubble stage. When you went to an investment conference in 1989, everybody owned Japanese stocks. And in 2000, everybody owned tech stocks. That is the bubble, when the majority of market participants own an asset. I think there are more people that own Apple stock than gold.
For Ebay I got Nike running shirt and a women's mini skirt, & Clifford book (for collection), Gymboree Sweater Dress, Scrabble Tiles, Gymboree bloomers, Thomas the Train replacement parts.
"Thank you, Penny." I say, warming to this young woman.
On the 3rd day the salt and mangoes will release water and the mangoes will be soaking in the spicy solution.
Beatles Across the universe UK
I decided to wait on wall decor until after she is born so I can hang photos of her (specifically a canvas above the dresser!)
Phenomenologists are well aware of the close ties between self and place. In the early works of Beckett it’s quite easy to place the text in an Irish, frequently Dublin-based, setting. In Watt when Watt arrives by tram he alights at Harcourt Street Station in Dublin, from which he will take a second tram to Foxrock and then walks to Cooldrinagh, Beckett's family home, which was the model for Mr Knott’s house; none of the place names are mentioned but the action had to take place somewhere and that was where he was familiar with at the time. In the later works the sense of placelessness is much, much stronger. Where do Didi and Gogo wait for Godot, for example? Beckett may well have had a location in mind – possibly the high moorland south of Dublin – but that is pure conjecture and irrelevant; they could have waited anywhere.
In my recent review of Marc live at Wilton's Music Hall, I mentioned the song Lavender, which at the show, was accompanied by a very striking slideshow, depicting a number of celebs and non-celebs alike, who in the past;
I wasn't feeling well, so this was the perfect project to keep me occupied.
The Jesus Lizard - a band very close to your humble blogger indeed - recorded two sessions for the late John Peel, in 1991 and 1992. Neither of these saw official release anywhere, not even as bonus tracks on the recent deluxe remasters on Touch and Go. Copies taped from the broadcast(s) did circulate among fans, but until today (err, last night) I'd never heard anything better than N-th generation cassette dubs with all the muffledness and noise that entails.
They are often nasty about me, rarely to my face, but I pick up on comments they make to each other. My drunken episodes are a constant source of amusement and bitching.
Please remember there are a few rules you should follow before entering the Challenge:
we are meant
The Nuremberg trials after the Second World War established aggressive war as the “supreme international crime, differing only from other war crimes in that it contains within itself the accumulated evil of the whole.”
... and here's the uncropped version, LOL! Hey - it's sunny and warm and definitely clothesline season!
“The writers of the Bible, inspired as I believe they were, they were nonetheless not inspired to do 21st Century physics,” he said.
Why is that, then? I would say that one of the reasons is that writers, like visual artists (photographers, painters and sculptors, for instance) have a more individual and self-centred approach to their oeuvre. Film-makers, who depend more on a collective, think nothing of re-doing a classic. This could be as a tribute to the original director, or because they think that they can improve on his/her magnum opus. Or simply because there's more money on the table. Which is why we can have Bride and Prejudice, the Bollywood movie, but no Pride and Prejudice, the new version by Danielle Steel. I don't think that I'm alone in thinking that a painter re-painting the Mona Lisa would probably take umbrage at him/herself. Same with a writer penning a second Moby Dick.
Stove Top Stuffing on sale $.75
I have a lot of places to visit in the Marais already, from small museums like the Cognacq-Jay to shops like Mariage Frères (where I'll be buying kilos of red and green tea) and Le Jardin Moghul. In addition to these, there are all the new stores and cafés to explore, and I almost don't want to over-think this section of the trip--who knows what delight will be around the corner as long as I'm actively looking. Still, there are a small number of shops I'm determined to visit, such as COS, at 4 rue des Rosiers, and Voyages (a dépôt-vente), at 82 rue Saint-Louis en l'Île. Would you have any other recommendations given my taste in clothes and food?
Now we are working on sustainable rehabilitation and skill development of trafficked girls. Rescue and other crisis intervention centers are smoothly functioning in Haryana and Punjab where we are working on trafficking and honor based crimes.
Spider has decided it's time to stop joy-riding. If he's caught again, he'll be sent down. Unfortunately, he can't resist the chance to show off to his girlfriend, Deanna. Just one last time won't do any harm he thinks....
Cut the dough into 8 pieces, shape them into balls and place them to prove on an oven tray lined with baking paper. Be sure to allow some room for the rolls to grow.
I packed my truck and headed dead north to the lovely city of Cleveland, Ohio. Situated on Lake Erie and home of the Rock n’ Roll hall of fame I saw and conquered as much of Cleveland as I could in one day. Allow me…
MOPS groups (Mothers of Preschoolers) are held in churches, and I went to the WRONG ONE.
For further information please contact:
The first present she opened was her Buzz Lightyear. I can't tell you the kick I got out of buying her Toy Story gifts! I never thought I would be re-buying all of that! She LOVED it. Rylan's comment when she opened it was "That's a boy toy!" lol...
from Mexico
I’m contentedly exhausted so I’m going to go for now, night all! Enjoy the pics which I’ve added to this post.
The kebabs are not spicy at all, so increase the amount of chilli powder or green chillies for a more spicier version. I made the dip spicy instead.
Sufjan Stevens - "Casimir Pulaski Day"
He had a t shirt on that said “liquor in front poker in rear”….well…if you read that slowly it can mean two different things…..read that again…..
I went through here in 199* to avoid military service. In the end I got several extensions for studies until December 2001, when this conscription system was abolished by another professional.
Each year, teachers request many un-recyclable items that I would not purchase for our home (plastic markers for example), but would consider for school use. In a perfect world, teachers would keep "still good" supplies for subsequent classes or at least donate them to the local thrift shops at the end of the year. Better yet, manufacturers would offer non-toxic stainless refillables of modern staples such as markers, and teachers would limit their demands to those available and reuse them. But until then...
Lorelai: Nope. He's the prince.
And one essential condition for that is the dollar demand internationally?
If a chocolate 3D printer in not in your budget at the moment, the alternative is: get into the kitchen and get busy!
Governor Thomas Dewey (the one who didn't defeat Truman) wanted to build a big highway from the Bronx to Buffalo that would reunite the state. It would have to cross the Hudson at some point, and he figured that the excess toll revenue from that crossing could fund the construction of the rest of the highway - a highway now known as the Thomas E. Dewey Thruway.
Any information of any of these would incidentally be most welcome.
Brian Terry’s murderer, Manuel Osorio-Arellanes, has yet to be tried, and the names of the other men involved in the incident have been blacked out in reports. Since they are–or should be–wanted criminals, the secrecy involving the investigation, along with the apparent lack of interest in finding the other parties and in trying Manuel Osorio-Arellanes is puzzling. The most logical explanation for sealing the records is that US Attorney General Eric Holder has poured cold water on the investigation because he does not want a report that would implicate Justice Department policies–and therefore him and his staff–in the more than 200 murders tied to Operation Fast and Furious.
I’m only starting with this because it’s going to be short.
Did you watch the Oscars last night and if so do you feel sick? The quote above is actually from Psychology Today and references a principle called the Social Comparison Theory. It turns out there is scientific backing for your “sickness”. The theory goes that in watching these award shows one can’t help but think about the glitz and glamour involved and feel a little inferior. It’s also the reason why many get a little thrill from the fashion flops, makes us feel a little better.
Paul did not dwell on the subject or rub it in. He didn’t belittle them by pointing out their shame for not following his advice. He remembered that for years he, also, had doubted the truth. But for the grace of God he would be just like them.
My path in artist perception has been random to say the least.
You just never know. Technology can be dangerous. Because while you are learning to use your new phone, you might also take an innocent but titillating picture of yourself right after photographing the hand-woven basket your sister made you for Christmas and then send the basket photo to your spouse and the titillating photo to your sister with the subject line, “Here’s your basket!”
- God (Elohim/Deity)
Robin and I do get to meet up with the girls again tomorrow for the hook~in. We are planning on leaving here at a bright & early 7am. I haven't packed yet... but will be sure to take my camera along so I can share the day with you too.
Don’t think it couldn’t be you -
I have had some professors who are not willing to work with me on this. In fact, this semester I took a class offered by the head of the English Department. The lady was all high and mighty and wasn’t willing to work with me on my participation grade, which was 10% of my grade, which doesn’t sound like much, but the class was insanely hard so I knew I needed that 10%. She managed to abide by all of the rules with what she was doing to me, and no one was willing to tell her what she was doing was wrong because she was the head of the department. I ended up having to drop the class because, honestly, at that point, I had completely lost my respect for her.
2 apples
Rain on the scarecrow blood on the plow
The list of fallen leaders goes on and on: Portugal’s José Socrates voted out of power in June 2011 … Denmark’s center-right government displaced in September … and Finland’s establishment parties struggling for their life to contain a sudden surge in the nationalist True Finns party.
This is the hair mustache. My husband decided that my little cloth doll I was working on needed a mustache. I am ashamed to admit that the nest he fashioned this stache out of came from my brush. I kind of like it...I think I'll keep it around.
Yay, a new drawing. Sorry for still not posting some of my commissioned paintings. I've got two that I want to post, one is in Baton Rouge right now, and one that I'm in the middle of working on. So I thought I'd post this one, which I think turned out pretty good.
** I love my caffeine cups - both tea and coffee- with plenty of sugar :-) and I can have a whole pack of (sweet) biscuits with them at a time ;-)
Sparkpeople is THE place to go to track your diet and fitness, and to find motivation and support. Check it out and be sure to look for all of the other great little features that I didn't mention.
On Monday I had my first visit with Dr. D-grief counselor. Yes, that's right, I finally did it. I finally decided to wave my white flag. I finally admitted to myself, that although I have seemed to fix myself my whole life, I may need some outside help to mend this broken lady right here. And so, on Monday I got to meet Dr. D and so far, I adore her. She gives me an insight and a point of view that I have never thought of. Which that's their job right? But she does it without making me feel like what I'm doing, thinking, feeling or acting is unnatural or weird. Again, her job right? Well amongst all the things we talked about in this 60 minute session. (who knew so much could be crammed into what seems so little time) she gave me a tool to use.
This move to lobby for Van Gundy’s job is another bad PR move by Howard. So I am going to guess that his bad advisers are still on his payroll. This move to get Van Gundy fired exposes Howard as a controlling, spoiled athlete. If he was so unhappy with the performance of Van Gundy or with their relationship, why retract his trade demand? Why sign a document to waive his ETO? If you are man enough to demand that he be fired behind close doors, then be man enough to stand up and say that you did it! It is very clear that Howard is not who we thought was.
Our restaurant expenses seemed surprisingly low to me. I feel like we do spend a lot of time eating out or getting take-out b/c we are so busy. So I guess I was expecting the worst in this category. We are buying for five (well four, Charlotte doesn't consume quite what the rest of us do) so a dinner out never costs us less than $50 even though we try hard to keep the cost down (no appetizer, have the girls share a dinner if we know the portion will be large, no alcohol, etc.). Again, I feel like this total can be lower and planning our weekly meals will help us accomplish this. No more, "Crap! What the hell am I going to make tonight? We need to leave for karate in an hour!". So even if we trim this figure by $50, I'll be excited and call it a success.
6. Dissension makes it impossible to manage your family properly.(13)
* In my future classroom, I think that I would incorporate both types of understanding into my curriculum. I think that instrumental understanding is an easy way for students to find solutions to problems and see the process. Instrumental understanding by itself, however, is not enough. Relational understanding gives meaning to the processes being completed and helps students relate to concepts and context.
In 1643, during the English Civil War, the Royalist Mayor of Newcastle, Sir John Marley, repaired the keep and probably also refortified the castle. In 1644 the Scottish army crossed the border in support of the Parliamentarians and 40,000 Scottish troops besieged Newcastle for three months until the garrison of 1,500 surrendered.
In this video, you will see a knucklehead who thinks that he is clever asking kids if they will redistribute their GPA points. Why? Because it’s like redistributing money!
You can collect 1 coin from him every 3 hours.
Looks familiar? I have a bit of a déjà-vu here… To read the article/blogpost for these 15 things click 15 Things You Should Give Up To Be Happy, where the things are explained more in detail. Highly recommend you read it!
On Bernanke’s reign at the Fed:
Oscar Peterson is, quite simply, one of the greatest virtuosos in jazz.
Well, I choose to see.
Cast:
Serving: 1 person.
It's so simple to maintain, even our 10 year old helps with putting away dishes and preparing lunches and it still looks like it did last year when I made the quick change.
Pour sauce over gnocchi and sprinkle with Parmigiano-Reggiano over top. Bake gnocchi until they puff and cheese is golden and bubbly, about 25 minutes. Let gnocchi rest for 5 minutes before serving.
What a mess Traffic Court has become! I’ve written twice about Traffic Court hi-jinks, once recently and once a few months ago. Quatrevaux conducted a study of 250 traffic tickets and found that just one person who contested a moving violation was found guilty. Of 93 people in that sample who fought their moving violations 92 people had their charges dismissed or allowed to plead to non-moving charges with fines.
This one is also all red and green. The traditional is the way to go for us. Doesn't mean I can't and won't appreciate other colored ones. The tree top Santa is a garage sale find. I bought him for I think $1.00. I knew when I saw him he would be a focal point and that he is. He is beautiful in person. We buy different things every year to keep adding to the tree. This year we found a warehouse and bought a bunch of different items. The smaller elves, the white sprays with the sparkly balls, the red and green twisty things (don't know what they are called), and some other items are all new. I have the big elf I put every year and when I saw the small ones I decided to incorporate them as well.
‘On the Genealogy of Morals’ was published in 1887. In these three essays he expands on and clarifies ideas he raised in ‘Beyond Good and Evil’. His first treatise (essay 1) explores the distinct linguistic origins of ‘good’ and how the ‘good/evil’ sense is different from the ‘good/bad’ sense of the word. He suggests that what was originally considered ‘good’ (as opposed to ‘bad’) came to be considered ‘evil’ in a slave morality. Things which had been praise-worthy to Homeric Greeks (strength and power) came to be considered evil by the moralities of Christians and Judaism. Instead weakness, and qualities found in slaves, were elevated to the good. We are not required to read from Essay 2 (which deals with concepts of guilt and conscience), but have one section from the third. Essay 3 focuses on the meaning of ‘the Ascetic Ideal’.
Could it just be that we are wandering into an era where we get a more focussed, more united Church with a much better understanding of the role of the Pope. The reading at Mass today (John 21:15-17) is Peter's threefold protestation of love for Our Lord and His three fold commandment to "Feed my sheep". Isn't that really what the papacy is all about? The successor of Peter is the one who must most amply display love of Our Lord and proclaim most visibly who He is (and correct where errors have come in regarding Jesus Christ since the preaching of the first apostles) and then, as a consequence of this, feed the sheep with the "Bread" that lasts. No Pope has ever been in error over these matters. Even young Patricius would struggle to argue with that. Popes may not always express their Theology with crystal clarity, but provided they know who Christ is, God doesn't expect them to be the cleverest of men. Popes may not always do the wisest of things (God doen't expect them to be the wisest of men). Changes to the liturgy are always done for pastoral reasons, but again they may not always be done with wisdom. Saints and Blesseds do not need to be wise or clever men but they must love Our Lord madly, foolishly and visibly.
There’s a lesson in that. A valuable one for us; living as we do in a multi-channel universe, yet narrowing our gaze, as we tend, to channels supporting the views we already hold. I’m as guilty of that as anyone. Maybe that’s why I didn’t ponder the hooper’s story before judging her behavior. And maybe that makes me no better than her—or her audience on the wharf. It sets my mind to spinning, thinking that.
Individual dance + Motown marathon
09. Superman
But, for me personally this week, I'm starting to wonder...when do my "nights out" end, if I'm attending four in a week? Does this at some point not change from "Girls' Night Out" into "Mom's Week-Long Bender?"
If you climb up out of the centre of the village, up West Lane, you will need a stout constitution and by the time you reach the top of the hill you will deserve a bottle of stout - or two. For previous generations of walkers, the Sun Inn at the junction of West Lane and the somewhat spooky Wicken Lane has provided refreshments for the weary traveler. But alas, the inn sign no longer swings in the north-easterly breeze, the hand-pumps no longer dispense Waller' Nourishing Stout or Hammonds Ales, and the brittle click of bone dominoes no longer sends cats seeking the shelter of cellars.
See you in 2012!
The engagement opens there and then in fantasy unreal,
What makes this better than living? Loving? Feeling? What kind of horrors did they go through before to lead them to this place?
Would I make them again? Probably not. As an old boss of mine, Angelo, used to say "the juice wasn't worth the squeeze." However, I would make the recipe again with all the filling just white. They were DELICIOUS. Like a hostess cupcake but a million times better.
Briefly Noted
Package Includes:
Christoph Over
Plus, with only blocks to go, I was anxious to get to her home, so, still a little conflicted, I passed the garden center and forged ahead. I arrived and pulled up, locking all my doors, even in her driveway. This was a New York City reflex for me when parking anywhere, perhaps stronger than the classic physiological knee-jerk reflex itself. The automatic response was permanently etched in my mind from the days of rampant vandalism in the city and No Radio signs.
The Sir Vival appeared on magazine covers. Jerome had fancy two-color sales brochures printed that extolled its virtues. But its fifteen minutes in the spotlight quickly elapsed and it sunk without a trace. Amazingly, the eccentric Sir Vival turned out to be a survivor after all. A little the worse for wear, it remains in the care of Bellingham Auto Sales in Bellingham, Massachusetts.
Much as the psychedelic revolution itself died out once the next decade started, so too did the Electric Circus. In March 1970, a bomb exploded on the dance floor (!) injuring 17 people, which couldn't have done much for its waning popularity.
SweetLi: I'm a comedian too. I've been doing it four and a half years. It' s really a 10-12 year process
I count the times that I’ve been sorry
A little surprise is hiding on one of the blogs today, so be sure to leave some comment love as you “hoof it” around the hop. One lucky commenter on the mystery slop spot will be in hog heaven and win a $15 gift certificate to Hambo Stamps!
Across Eastern Europe, the collapse of Communism catalyzed filmic retrospection, as documentaries and feature films analyzed the Stalinist past and fascism's legacies. 1-page abstracts by 10 March 2011; Monique Yaari (mxy2@psu.edu).
Than starving to death
I arrived at KCC at 12:55nn. I waited for my fellow KPOP Advance to talked about the plan for eonnie.
“Oh they’ll work in the rain, don’t worry!”
Y'all know I love my NARS Velvet Matte Lip Pencil in Damned. I bought it because of True Blood, even though the NARS Facebook page states that Pam was apparently wearing Cruella (either she was holding Cruella and was actually wearing something else, or it's bullshit entirely). It's a gorgeous vampy berry shade that glides on the lips and sets to a matte finish. It's lovely worn lightly as a stain, on its own for a deep berry lip, or with a darker liner for an even vampier look.
So, will I go again? If I’m in the company of friends and people from the things I like show up again, certainly. However, I’m already scheduled to go back to the Seattle Convention Center next weekend. Sakura-Con starts, this one celebrating anime (which typically draws from a very similar pool to the comic con, but not entirely the same). For this, I’ll probably be there all three days. It also has the advantage (or disadvantage) of running 24 hours. So whenever you leave to go home to rest and clean up, there’s still something going on back there that you’d probably want to catch. I’ll try to let you know how it goes next weekend.
We don't yet live in a new age of superstition, but there's a sense that something might break. Rather than seeing as the "Occupy" movement or the summer riots as signs of an angered, engaged population, what surprises is how, compared with previous ages, how little is going on. Visiting the Manchester Histories Festival in the Town Hall on Saturday I was amazed by the amount (and the nicheness) of the local history groups present. What would "success" mean to each of them? A new member? Three or four conversations? A book or an artefact sold? Who knows? Looking for something to eat I ended up in the shopping district. A crowd gathered as there was some freestyle kids dancing competition on a packed Market Street. Elsewhere, the Arndale centre was hardly negotiable, so many people were out and about. There is nothing supernatural about consumption - and here we are, trained to do it, continuing to do it, finding a small bit of spiritual release in doing it.
At this point I want to keep my Gooner readers happy and give The Arsenal a shout-out. They have epitomised team spirit for me this season, they have been a joy to watch. If I had to choose one team from the Premier League who are really enjoying playing the game, it would be the North Londoners in red. They all seem to have a smile on their face, and a spring in their step, and for that I applaud them.
Father's Name: J. Manlick
Under Rule 10.5 the Tribunal can make “Directions” as to procedures which the participants must follow, on pain, under Rule 10.5.3, of the Tribunal finding there has been a breach. In that event the Tribunal can penalise the participant for the Breach.
in two days, we will send the draft agenda
looking for heads
The discussion panel chews over the so-called 'independent academic review'. I'm asking my MP to raise this with the Department of Health.
Our insider information is that it has been the arguments over the dividing of the spoils of this contract that has caused the split in Mawan’s party. Apparently, other YBs are angry and jealous that he has grabbed so large a share of the profits for himself!
Who is that friend of hers? Every guy will immediately know what I’m talking about. If you’re a woman, listen up.
Despite claims to the contrary, overturning a law would not be unprecedented. Since 1803, the US Supreme Court since has asserted the power to strike down laws it interprets as unconstitutional.
On September 11, 2001, the United States government held a series of military exercises and drills. Operation Northern Vigilance was a NORAD operation, which involved deploying fighter aircraft to the northwestern part of North America, specifically Alaska and Northern Canada. The exercise was one part simulation, one part real world. It was in response to a similar test acted out by Russia on September 11, where long-range bombers were dispatched to Russia’s high north. The exercises were immediately called off after the news of the terrorist attacks, and all simulated information was purged from NORADs computer screens. However, the event was a distraction for the US government on 9/11.
this is the opposite side of the room, if you are sitting on the sofa:
I was never really in it all the way.
Spring time to me in southern Ontario, was while cycling, marked by these annual flowers as well as the purple bunches and smell of lilacs and yellow brilliance of forsythia bushes. Once we cycled a 120 km. trip between Toronto and Hamilton’s Royal Botanical Gardens, where there was a large demonstration area of a wide variety of lilacs.
The positive economic impact of shale oil extraction has been shown in North Dakota.
(and you tell me that Harvard has a Jesuit house).
His face said it all after the first call.
URAN 1 —
Well, now I know why I'm so uncomfortable. That baby is transverse again.
Sometimes the obvious things just smack us in the face, don't they? On several occasions, I've found myself in this very position! Silly me -- I forgot to ask!
Overall I'm pretty happy with it, and I love the way the collar stands up and just shows hints of the neck and collarbones. Modest, but almost in a teasing way, if I do say so myself! And I love the buttons. Buttons are always very nice.
I am really not motivated to pack- like can't even organize my brain to do it.
Over a very English snack of tea and biscuits, Mayall, 42, and Edmondson, 43, try to explain their unique brand of humour.
I shall let the picture reveal my choice:
It is not the American way to become more like Saudi Arabia or Iran. There they have public dress codes, Shariah law and other niceties like stonings, beheadings and honor killings. Ours is a modern society based on humanistic behavior, on accommodating the individual – not serving the Sheik, the Imam, the police or local thugs.
As a young lad I did not know that Hooper's depiction of Mr. Barlow in Lot was an homage to the ORIGINAL cinematic vampire, Count Orlok, portrayed by Max Schreck in F.W. Murnau's classic silent film Nosferatu (1922).
What's in them: (organic)
Why did the police not interview the person “employing” Mr Mulcaire and paying him £105,000 per annum?
Here are some pics of my pages, there's still plenty of room for the journaling, that will come.... either with my wine or my coffee:):)
If your friend is placed into immigration custody, before the actual deportation/removal proceedings start, she will likely be transferred to an immigration detention center. If you are trying to locate her, you can use a detainee locator tool on the ICE website (https://locator.ice.gov/odls/homePage.do). If your friend was officially booked, this tool will allow you to find out where she is being held. You can also call your local Immigration and Customs Enforcement office.
blessing
Then said one of the earl’s men, called Thorir: “He swaggereth hugely, this Icelander! It would not be amiss to try him a little.”
In medium bowl, combine flours, sugar and salt. Stir in coconut oil with fork, or mix with fingers, till well distributed and clumps form. Stir in pecans and coconut. Set aside.
I'm very happy with Space Cadet! After wearing it, it has become one of my favorites. If you love duo-chromes or multi-chromes, then you'll love this. It's hard not to!
Desai
Ended when the train arrives,
But then I have to step back, remove myself from that space, from that heavy distraught feeling. I have to let it go. It hangs there, it doesn't dissipate, but I stand outside rather than within it. It is done, this has happened, the situation is, what can I do now? Not make this mistake again. Not go to the writer's conference this year. Try to squeeze this money out of other areas of my life. Feeling distraught and sick over it, that wont help at all.
The fact of the matter is Jacob had the birthright. The point is Israel is Israel and God will use this.
Our other adventure was in search of Zenkov Cathedral in Panfilov Park. It took a bit of doing but we finally located it. It was a nice walk looking around Almaty while in search of our destination. I'd take pictures every block or two - so if we got lost (all signs were in Russian) we'd have some sort of digital breadcrumbs to retrace our path home. We found one park and thought we had arrived only to figure out - hey this isn't it! Where is that darn Cathedral? It's big AND colorful - how can we not find it? So we continued our journey and located another park. And this time our diligence paid off and we found it. It is a beautiful yellow color and very nice shape. It was a glorious site when we found it. We could only stay a few minutes before heading back to the apartment. We saw the park, went inside the Cathedral for a bit, and took our standard Trish and Ray head pose in front of it, hold the camera at arm's length - smile - then click.
You probably would have learned that if you paid attention in English or took Philosophy courses. But you probably refused to because they were probably all brain-dead hippies in your mind. And you’re too cool and too much of an individual to listen to them.
Contestant: Blimey?
despite the harsh, flickering, fluorescent light
This year is no exception.
"you bitch! Hahahahahahahha God I love ya."
7:30 – The Mother Hips, These United States, The Loom @ Bowery Ballroom $15 (21+)
I was interested in librarian.net by Jessamyn West. Her bio says that she works in a rural Vermont library which promised to be very interesting to me since I work in a remote region. Her latest post advertises an online conference called Big Talk for Small Libraries, which could be very interesting for me to attend. I may continue to follow librarian.net due the similarity in our work situations.
Pacific Gas And Electric Issues $600 Million Of 8.25% Senior Notes Due 2018 26
“Herr Tusch is a lager brewer of great repute whose cleanliness and quality is of the highest order, with barrels filled and delivered fresh within the astounding radius of ten blocks from his business address.”
Manufacturers’ Association of
Now mowing the weeds of conformity
Buy Nikon Coolpix L100 To Get High Resolution Images
Cooperative Longbow/Lancer 2007 was conducted in Albania and the following year’s exercise in Armenia. All five nations – Moldova, Albania, Armenia, Georgia and Macedonia – are deeply involved, either on their own territory or in neighboring nations, in one or more of the conflicts discussed above. In 2009 Armenia, Kazakhstan, Moldova and Serbia withdrew beforehand because of the Georgia-Russian war of a few months earlier and Estonia and Latvia did also because of an anti-government mutiny staged the day before the almost month-long exercise began.
More Jesus.
Needless to say, this is the last type of ‘foursome’ he needed during the most important week of 2012.
I am using mine for a bit of rustic Christmas decor. Using my grandma’s wood bowl, some fresh cut Rosemary (OMG, you would not believe how amazing it smells!) branches I just cut and a couple of Dollar Tree Ribbon Candy ornaments. Very simple.
To put this into perspective however, we are not talking about the issues on a scale that Latin America or the US face. Every nationality of organised criminal I have thus far mentioned and more will be present in the US and operating. The physical human insecurity of massive numbers of murders, kidnappings and carnage that can be seen across Latin America and the Caribbean fortunately does not happen in Ukraine.
To passionate timelessness.
Scary Bastard?--Yeah, would be scarier though if he did'nt wear my Dads jumpers!
Short of that, I play the innocent voyeur and live vicariously through what positive energy I do see. I smile as little children giggle hysterically, training their parents to chase after them. I gently step aside as an elderly couple make their way past me, steadying each other, arm-in-arm, safely shuffling by. I feel their warmth and want to be a part of it. And so, I finally step outside myself and offer a big smile and a “Good Morning!” The little woman looks up at me with a knowing twinkle in her eyes and smiles. She doesn’t say anything but conveys nonetheless that we have connected. I pass a middle-aged couple standing off to the side of the path, each staring lead-faced out over the water. I am within a couple of feet of them and offer a bright “Good Morning” to the woman. Her face immediately softens and she gives me a most genuine smile in return and echoes the sentiment. Its affect reverberates within me–how cold her face was before the hello and how warm it was afterwards. That was enough to convince me. From there on I actively set out to say hello to everyone I passed. I spun around to offer amusing anecdotes to couples or groups of people I encountered and interrupted my walk on occasion to have short conversations with people who were alone. It was such an amazing walk, I almost hated to leave.
May I present Miss Bobbie Merleyamaid. Your (sea)weed dealer of the sea. (That's a joke about pot. And a stereotype about people with dreadlocks. The Man made that up. I thought it was worth using. If you made it this far you deserve a chuckle. You're welcome.)
Lauryn Hill: The Miseducation of Lauryn Hill
Eating fast food is a habit, but it is one that you can break? No doubt you rarely plan to have a delicious meal at Arby’s for dinner, a lingering lunch at Carl’s Jr. or a special breakfast at the Burger King in the airport. It just happens. You are late, tired, hungry, broke, or all of the above. You have no time, and you must find something to eat before you crash. All of a sudden a bright, friendly sign beckons from the side of the road: Drive-through!
I also remember that my mom said sometimes “what are you gonna do when you grow up and don’t have anyone to save you”
The Queso Fresco, Panela, and Requeson cheeses are sold at Queseria Bendita’s retail store and were distributed in Washington and Oregon, where they are sold in Hispanic markets.
This is the latest flick from Aardman Animation, aka the witty Brits from ‘Wallace & Gromit’, and ‘Chicken Run’, which means, in terms of comedy, this film has a whole lot to live up to. But when you touch something like pirates and try to make them goofy, it more or less just comes off as being another ‘Pirates of the Caribbean’ flick, except in stop-motion form.
AAMER ANWAR- RESPONSE TO APPEAL TO SECOND SIFT IS REFUSED- CONFIRMED THIS MORNING BY LETTER.
While the carrot cupcake made Ong's Top 5 must-eat list, the strawberry did not. Here are his picks:
Do you have a dream project you'd love to write?
He is called Liverpool's Loveliest One
Sunday Long Island Marathon WOOHOO!
"Blossom is in big trouble. Her grandfather warned her not to go beyond the village gates. After all, no caterpillar in Twig Valley has ever ventured there and returned to tell.
Bauer also seems to have thought that Paul was in continual conflict with the Jewish Christians in Jerusalem. This does not seem to be the case, although one might describe the situation as “cool” between the Gentile mission and the Jerusalem church based on Acts 21.
So, on my birthday, July 17th, 2011, my partner whom I love dearly brought me my birthday cake, with a big blue “4″ candle next to a big blue “0″ candle, blazing away. I inhaled, closed my eyes, and wished with all my heart —in exactly these words—”God, please please please, if you grant any wish for me, please let it be for Joe and I to get out of this awful place and be happy, you pick, anywhere you want, if you could—let it be someplace GREEN!” and I blew out my 40th birthday candles.
I creep to my chair and come a-trembling, empty and in need.
Intranet –
When I was a lot younger, I tried writing poetry about the First War, largely inspired by Owen. I’ve stopped doing that now, because I can imagine battalions of ghostly critics, Tolkien among them, shaking their heads in disapproval and reminding me that I wasn’t there; I can’t know. You can only catch a glimpse of what they experienced from what they wrote, and this sort of poetry only works properly when it speaks with the voice of experience. I wouldn’t want to offend the ghost of Siegfried Sassoon: he could be biting. I’ll end with one of his scathing attacks on the jingoistic public, Base Details.
Who am I to judge young love.
Save $0.50 on Mr. Clean with the Scent of Gain Liquid or Spray
It was our small contribution to a very big problem. I must admit it did feel rather overwhelming, but sometimes that’s all it takes: “one wave to create a ripple effect,” so they say. I was actually hoping it would entice fellow vacationers to do the same, perhaps even persuade them to clean up after themselves.
John Geraets / Poems - Stunning Debut: Willy's return / 6
Gregory: what hell was going on at
Rep. Michele Bachmann won the Ames straw poll, but only by 152 votes over fellow Rep. Ron Paul. That is right, Dr. Ron Paul was the original and first seed that actually grew the now Tea Party that has since branched off and also ALIENATED him. Ron Paul is the ONLY Republican that actually stands for the Republican Party's original core values of a FREE society. Today's candidates are mirroring his viewpoints that he had in the past. They certainly are not attacking him so aggressively as they did in the 2008 debates. It should matter to you, as it does me, that he is a true Constitutionalist. His record, for all these years, shows it plainly. We MUST do something about it. I disagree with some things of Ron Paul, but to shake the system up and clean house, this is our best shot to send such a strong message.
Oregon's Bill of Rights, Article I, Sect. 2 " All men shall be secure in the Natural right, to worship Almighty God according to the dictates of their own consciences..."
armpits were soaked he came in to dry out
* 1/4 tsp pepper
and uses the two together, is such use capable of amounting to use of the graphic device mark for the purposes of Article 15 of Regulation 40/94? If yes, how is the question of use of the graphic mark to be assessed?
When I look back, I'm just a bit upset about Merry-Go-Round's albums. We weren't flexible or experienced enough to contain all the good ideas in the album.
Kevin tried again to challenge for the leadership in February. He had seen enough and it was time to take back the job that was rightfully HIS. The Ruddites kicked into high gear to back Kevin all the way, by writing to each member of the House of Representatives and the Senate, to return Kevin back. Many sitting members received OVER 1,000 emails from members in their seats urging them to vote for Kevin. There were some who would not listen to those outside their electorate, Kate Ellise is one of those who comes to mind. She gave an interview, in which Kevin was to have said all these nasty things about the PM. It came out later that Ms. Ellis took what she had heard OUT OF CONTEXT, and accused Kevin of saying what she had heard. There are many more stories out there I am sure that. There were even rumors of bullying with the threat of pre-selection being taken if votes didn’t go Ms.Gillard’s way.
Q034) If you were a boy, which member would you want to date?
I also felt this novel managed to capture a sense of realism that a romance is generally unable to do.
Be your child's partner, not the wall, between them and what they really want. If they want something and you don't have the money for it, be honest and real about it, and partner with them to dream of ways of earning the money to buy it, or to be open to other ways that that thing can come into the child's life. Dayna spoke of her daughter, who desperately wanted to have a big pink toy car. She was so excited about it, and dreaming of driving it around with her dolls in the back of it. She asked her mum, but they couldn't afford it (it was about $300) so her mother suggested that they think of it and dream of it, and lo and behold, three days later Dayna received a phone call from a long lost friend, inviting them for a visit. When they went there, the friend was showing them something non-related in the garage and when she raised the door, there was the exact same pink car Tiffany had been dreaming of. Some comment was made and the lady was like, "Oh, that old thing. Do you want it? My daughter outgrew it years ago. :) Money isn't the only means.
And annihilate the whining, silly crowd
And, well, that tortured poet girl doesn't live too far under my skin. I can't ever keep her buried for too long. I guess I should just embrace her, because she is me.
It most definitely came from my children, JJ and Rach, now aged 9 and 10, both avid readers and story listeners. Several years ago, we all went to see the Nutcracker Suite Ballet. Rach loved the ballet, JJ not so much. But he did enjoy one part – the battle scene with the mouse king and the cannon.On returning home after the ballet, JJ looked thoughtful.
In the small town of Linton, ND, population of about 1,300, Mrs. Linda Kelsch gave her third-grade classroom a writing assignment on “whether or not to allow smoking in all public areas or privately owned businesses in Linton.” Their answers are simply stated and to the point: smoking makes people sick, causes pollution, and is bad for our community.
Let’s try to answer that question with a bit of reason and logic, in the form of another question:
For the damned there is always a stranger
But a very happy dork none-the-less, because there
Angels are sent by God to bring us guidance and protection. Angels are extremely advanced with their knowledge and spirituality. They don’t have any imperfections; they live merely to help, guard, and love. Angels are the closest creations to God that we can comprehend.
First of all, is it a bear? Does Stiegler get what Marx has in mind here?
The Brewers Association has released their list of the top 50 craft breweries (which ridiculously does not include Widmer and the other CBA breweries) and a number of other Oregon breweries are on the list. But creeping in at #50 is Ninkasi, so now we can watch as they make a steady climb up the list (as I have no doubt they will do).
“Yep, job number two. I’ll be bringing a new little helper,” she grinned.
I’m not suggesting that we should never take a break from our writing. A hiatus here and there can bring us back to our work refreshed. Rest and new input are useful. Sometimes, our brains form new patterns, and our writing may be better than ever.
I smiled to myself and we rode in silence for a second.
He was a very brave man doing the right thing, an openly gay, gay rights campaigner in a backwater for human rights: Uganda; itself the ugliest jewel in the twisted crown of African homophobia.
Tuesday: 30 minute tempo run. 3.1 miles in 30:05. Not shabby at all for three days post-13.1. Even splits. Hard effort.
Time to hang it up.
Forty years as a pageant, still unawares the lady of this teeming and
Even the most expensive, delicate microphone can offer no assistance to an overworked, misused voice. We’ve got to nurture and take care of our prized instrument.
1 universe
Please be assured that I fully intend to fix all of the broken links, along with providing many more recordings for you to enjoy.
Dreaming is something that has always fascinated me. I remember as a young person borrowing a library book about dream meanings. I even kept a dream diary for awhile. I have occasionally wondered if dreams are the subconscious’ way of telling us things, or if the mind is simply sorting through files and files of information while we rest. This was last night’s dream:
Salt and pepper
This non-profit has practiced patience for years and allowed programs and projects to evolve. Due to this type of process, we are now able to begin to grow and gain attention. We are now able to touch more lives at a greater scale. This is what you call grassroots and at the local level. A pace that some might not understand or relate to as a benchmark of success, but I do. I am free because I have a strong sense of purpose in what I do. Those that embrace the non-profit are generous and like possibility. They step up to the plate because they choose to belong and practice their freedoms.
The Lorax comes out March 2nd (or as we teachers know it as Read Across America Day and Dr. Seuss' birthday) and I can't wait to see it!! The Lorax is definitely one of my favorite Dr. Seuss books and the movie looks fabulous. I think this game that Maggie made to celebrate the new Lorax movie is so fun. You've gotta click over and see the finished Lorax once the game is completed. It's super cute.
My friend and I decided we had to make an audible and go with something other than Texas beer. I just needed that Bacon flavor out of my mouth. And I needed a Westcoast IPA to make it happen. My friend got a Westmalle. Amber color, strong hops that are flowery and citrus. Yes sir! Creamy white head. The taste is a strong malt followed by a strong hops. I'm thinking maybe Cascade and some other hops. It's not overwhelming but this one got the job done. 3-4 Star.
6. Yogi Bear
GYST teaches you the business stuff you should have learned in art school, but didn’t. GYST values self-sufficiency and presents you with information, skills, and strategies to make things happen without necessarily waiting around for some arbiter of culture to validate your work. We’re not concerned with producing slick, commercialized artists, nor is this some new age, touchy-feely “find your inner artist” crap. GYST is a program for artists, by artists that will teach you bare-knuckled, practical strategies for negotiating the baffling terrain of the contemporary art world, whether you are interested in working with galleries, or creating a DIY or social practice.
Neither Nic nor Erica had ever thought much about online dating until they tried it and met each other! It was love at second or was it third site? Oh well, it did get them interested enough for Nic to court Erica with dates around their home city, Seattle, just like they were tourists! Not only did they get to see some fun sites, they realized they were meant to be together.
Dress & socks: BG72, 10, 0000; for the lace I used C1
1. Buy food in jars where you would typically buy cans. Look for stewed tomatoes, beans and soups in glass jars instead of cans. You might be surprised at how easy it is to find these today.
“Pert then wiped the backups and never returned to work. There is evidence he also copied some of the commercially sensitive data but he told police he couldn’t remember what he did with it.” said the report.
While you wouldn’t necessary think to check-in at Prezzo or Carluccio’s, there’s just something about Nando’s that makes you want to tell your Facebook friends that you’re there.
Little girl fourteen flipping through a magazine
- miles davis - pangaea - columbia records / 4 men with beards - 1976/2012 (lp reissue)
It is the Colour week at Less Is More - Yellow, it appears not a favourite for many, but I love it, it is so fresh, bright and cheery. I first cut up a piece of bubble wrap, added Mustard Seed TH Distress ink directly to the bubbles side. Gently lay it directly onto the card and gently pressed. I am impatient, so, I dried it with my heat tool. When dry, I used Memento Rich Cocoa ink to stamp one of my newest stamps from Indigo Blu - Nature 1. The greeting stamp is an old foam one but I love the font and find it suitable for so many occasions.
The morning started off great. My eyes opened at 8:12AM for an 8:30AM appointment across town. Flurry of SHIT SHIT SHIT SHIT, run to the metro with my giant GET LEGAL folder and off to yet another prefecture. The hives started the moment I left, by the time I got there, the tears were lined up and ready to go. French language skills out the window. Check, check and check.
Thank you for a wonderful journey with you so far. I look forward to many more times of sharing the words of the angels.
This country is lost, to say the least. It is so focussed on the negative that the long term positive outcome is missed completely. A self-centred negativity prevails sparking the flight response whereby everyone wants to leave and follow idealists promising a promised land, a Canaan of their own, a volkstaat in their language.
3. We aren't fully vaccinating. In fact, presently, we aren't vaccinating at all. Until I've done enough research to know what is going into her and why. And when we do it'll be on our own schedule. Three injections in one day is not happening (don't call CPS).
I’m so close to this becoming very real; I mean it is real, but it seems more finite, more final.
The hope is that the extra lag time will result in more thoughtful posts, as I will have had a chance to internalize our culinary experiences.
As for me, I had a great time with my mom; it was a nice and quiet holiday.
The question is what was said to the plaintiffs. According to the suit, instructors told participants they would earn $100,000 a year, or an hourly rate of $45, and get at least ten years of work.
One of my project this weekend was a heart shaped mini album. I wanted to make a shape and this seemed easiest. Well it actually was using my cricut machine. I cut the cereal boxes first, changed the blade and cut the paper. Then the assembly wasn't too bad. Although hot gluing the lace to it was a bit harder on a few fingers than the others, be careful...very careful with hot glue. My situation is my husband gave me an industrial size glue gun so it comes out in a wider space than what I need. I think a new glue gun purchase is on the horizon for me.
And s'mores. Many...many...many s'mores.
I don't know if it's because I've watched this movie too many times and it's turned me into a hypochondriac, but last week I went to the doctor and she called on Friday and left me a voicemail on my cell phone to call her back at my earliest convenience, but didn't say what it was about.
Until next time . . .
Congratulations! Please feel free to grab the blinkie on the sidebar (the code you need is below it) and display it proudly on your blogs! You earned it :)
You know me, I'd probably be excited with just a broom closet, but peek your head further into the space and you will find a set of dairs plunging ominously down into darkness. Follow the faint glow of what lies beyond and the subtle yet distinct smell of ground corn and you find an entire workshop beneath the restaurant's floor! Bags upon bags of stacked hard white corn placed before a labyrinth of slides, chutes, tubes and vats of boiling hot water making NYC's only nixtamalization (real word!) machine!!!
(Sorry, “Krypton” is not an option.)
DKNY black leather coin purse (holds gift cards, discount cards, and coupons)
I remember thinking at the time that The Green Hornet would have been better had it featured bad language, nudity, and violence… Which is weird, because Seth Rogen was recently interviewed by Howard Stern, and he essentially admitted that the movie sucked because it was PG13 and not R. I kind of believe him. He’s for sure right about it sucking.
As what seemed liked coach after coach continued to pull up on the dock side alongside the ship, the crowd of people all making their way through the terminal building ahead of them and up onto the ship seemed to grow by the second, the ground around them covered in an array of different sized and coloured suitcases, all waiting to be delivered to their respective cabins so that their owners could start planning their wardrobes for the various dinners and long nights of entertainment that were going to take place over the course of this cruise. It was a freestyle cruise – which meant that the dress code leaned more towards the casual than the formal – but dressing up was still very much a big part of this kind of holiday. Especially for the women. And Aimee was no exception. She had a suitcase full of new clothes she
“What’s your shoe size?”
My first foray into this product was a requirement through my Dt position at OCC, I swallowed hard that day, but I made the card, not one of my better ones I will hasten to say.
I stayed and visited with my cousins for a little while after the hospice volunteer left, Grandma still sitting beside me. Debbie said Grandma needed to get back to bed. She helped Grandma up off the couch and waited, her arm linked in Grandma’s to steady her. I said goodbye and prepared to leave.
- You must have a blog and Facebook account and update it regularly each week including posts about projects you’ve used from the kit, design tips etc. We ask that you also have links to our site on your blog and other sites where allowable.
It’s a challenging life, but not one I would trade for any other. I love my little man, and everything he brings to the table.
The lawyer explain, "It's common in a Joint-Venture Agreement. One of you will get slaughtered."
A key component of the America’s Great Outdoors Initiative (AGO) is conserving and restoring large landscapes. Successful landscape-scale conservation efforts, inherently cross-jurisdictional, demand collaboration across federal agencies and with state and local partners to achieve more effective alignment and better leveraging of resources. In the fall of 2011, a Council on Environmental Quality convened AGO workgroup established five regional interagency landscape conservation teams to promote coordination, improved communication, and collaboration with local partners. The regional teams are focused on five landscapes, which will serve as demonstration sites and models for aligning, targeting, and better leveraging federal resources and achieving more strategic landscape conservation outcomes. The five landscapes are: the longleaf pine forests of the Southeast; the deserts of the Southwest; the grasslands of the northern Great Plains; the Crown of the Continent in the northern Rockies; and the northern forests and waters of New England.
That subject that I loathed in high school actually came in handy...
“These truths are well known among our principal men, who are now engaged in forming an imperialism to govern the world. By dividing the voter through the political party system, we can get them to expend their energies in fighting for questions of no importance.
We gave away a scholarship at my hometown high school FFA Banquet in my brother's memory like we always do. Then, the kids raised $1300 for Matt"s Scholarship fund. 2 kids received the Matt Monroe Star Greenhand award as well.
Kellie Wells (US) also continued her fine indoor campaign in Karlsruhe, running a world leading 7.82 in the women’s hurdle event. Wells now has the top six times in the world this indoor season and is .16 sec faster indoors than ever before – which could mean a new PR (currently 12.53) outdoors. She’ll be one to watch once the under cover season is over.
In retrospect, I realize now that the culture of drugs in our home had a lot to do with how unsafe I felt. They grew marijuana in a closet under grow lights and sold it. Neighbor boys rolled oregano joints and asked me to give them to my mom as a joke. My mom and stepfather threw parties where people would be so stoned they would pass a joint to me, a kindergartner. Even then, somehow, I knew what they wanted me to do was wrong. My refusing an offered joint was just one small example of how God had already put a fierce conscience inside me.
This move was opposed, and by 1933 the Nationalist government appointed a chief justice of the Chinese Supreme Court to systematize and promote the traditional system of medicine. In contemporary China, both traditional and Western forms of medicine are practiced alongside each other.
The nose on this has rotting plant matter with motor oil, flowers and sugar cane...and I like it. The palate is similarly funky with some definite white wine influence, corn syrup and maybe even some soy sauce and mushrooms. Water on this one brings out both the sweetness and the smoke. The finish is just peaty.
Evelyn Telfer, a reproductive biologist at Edinburgh University, has already informally approached the Human Fertilization and Embryology Authority (HFEA) with a view to submitting a formal license application within the next few weeks.
This was a serious problem for the PCs, but the trend was reversible.
WHOAAAAAAAAA.....Just seen that i hadnt written a post since february?!? wtf?!?!
For the first time, I understood that when I turn 39 next week, there will be no one to ask me, “Whatchya’ want for your birthday, cutie?” followed by a card with money in it because she couldn’t decide what to get me.
As I looked around the street I noticed more shoring up activity at the edges of cracks, the boundaries between one kind of tarmac and the later repair as well as at the joints in the coping stones at the pavement's edge.
Alice has fled from a society that expects her to act a certain way only to land in a society that expects her to act a certain way.
may I at last discover that elusive peace I do seek.
It’s pretty funny… I am living with my brother, sister-in-law, and 5 year old niece here in Idaho. My niece and I are two of a kind… I just love her. Love her to pieces. We’ve had a special bond since the day she was born. I spent a lot of time with her the first couple years of her life, then I lived in this house for a year before I moved to California. She and I really grew and developed a special bond. When I moved, she was really upset. She was so sad, and every time I came home for visits, she asked me “Why do you have to live in California?” When I told her I had to live there to work, it was always, “Well, why can’t you work here?” And every time I had to get ready to go again, go to the airport, it was serious tears and then the silent treatment. She would always turn silent, keeping her head down and “mourn” quietly. Within a few hours though, she would be back to her normal self. She never liked to have phone calls, or skype calls, or anything when I was gone. It was almost like if she didn’t acknowledge I was gone, she wouldn’t be sad about it. Something like that… I know she is smart enough to probably avoid the things that make her sad.
Roadrunner by The Modern Lovers
I’ve frequently written that I think the same passage is a primary reason many people find it difficult to follow Jesus—because this passage is so convicting and calls for such radical sacrifice.
We often see deer on the golf course behind our house in the late afternoon, but on Sunday we saw a mother and three fawns out at noon, which is very unusual.
So I'm just wondering ... do you keep certain items reserved for special occasion and company-only use, or do you mix pieces from Target (or other) and Noritake (or other) with abandon and just enjoy your things? I'm getting a little tired of being a curator and think I need to get my set of china into the kitchen and onto the table. What do you think?
What If….
PS:I think another post of Eric with his thoughts on this would follow later.
If you are unable to offer Team Reels on Wheels your financial support or a donation at this time, but you know someone who may be interested in helping them to achieve their goal, then please would you pass this letter on? Thanks very much for taking the time to read about it and if you’d like to discuss the mission further, please don’t hesitate to call or email us!”
But, this post isn't about "most women" and what they do.
Apparently, my writing self and my actual self need to have a pow-wow and get on the same page.
This lemon-wet-damp-cloth-grease smell sounds disgusting. But I liked it. I don't know why, I just did. And it's a smell, or a sense memory of one, that I get from some ultra-hoppy IPAs. Just as runny French cheese might be described as 'sweaty socks', or certain aged beers as 'farmyard', divorced from its context - or perhaps even because of it if we're driven by bravado - it's a negative association used to describe an appealing smell. If you've ever heard me describe a beer as smelling of 'wet dishcloth', this is a more detailed description of what I mean.
We received 3 new books today. Zentagle Basics, Zentagle 2 and Totally Tangled. These are great for anyone who likes doodling or wants to learn to doodle.
He followed me around again talking for a while until his Dad called him, and off he went happily, saying goodbye politely to let me know he was going with his Dad now.
(a)organised or trained or equipped for the purpose of enabling them to be employed in usurping the functions of the police or of the armed forces of the Crown; or
Left in this world behind
I felt my heart beating faster and I started to sweat a little in the 55 degree weather as I stared at the well worn soles of my little boy's sneakers as they dangled 131 feet above me. The wait for them to come back down was agonizing.
Price: $6.79 each
Instead of driving straight Dunn's River Falls after lunch, the bus driver swung into a shopping area (that I don't think that was on the tour itinerary) and gave us 15 minutes to shop. It took closer to 20 minutes for everyone to return to the bus. Ten minutes later we pulled into the parking lot at Dunn's River Falls. The tour guide gave us a time to be back at the bus, then let everyone wander on their own. Originally Tony and thought we were going to climb up the falls (and wore water shoes), but we chickened out at the last minute. Instead, we took pictures of Brian and Nicole as they climbed from the stairs next to the falls.
BLEND THE TWO IDEAS?…
(I am sorry! I will just apologize now)
So I’m still in the game, waiting on new approval on some new scam to get Bulletholes $80,000 and in the meantime I am safe and happy living with my friend Angel Eyes, and we have cable, a couch, a stove and a pool, and I get up in the morning and the coffee is made and the birds are chirping and there is money in the bank baby, the money just keeps rolling in, and I get out of the shower I start singing because that’s what like to do in the morning….
Students and visitors were reminded that the Arts Alive Program is truly a community effort thanks to numerous volunteers from Hardwood Products, the “HUGS” parent group, teachers, parents and other individuals from around the area including some high school students from Piscataquis Community High and Middle School.
Prize Pack 2 is a Preorder Pack
There are certainly moves in this direction, with increasing interest in autism subgroups, individual variation, and cross-diagnostic comparison. Perhaps the most radical new approach was recently announced by the Simons Foundation. The Variation in Individuals Project is looking at deletions and duplications in region 16p11.2 of chromosome 16, which has been linked to autism, developmental delay, schizophrenia, and bipolar disorder. But rather than looking only at people who meet criteria for a particular condition, participants are being recruited regardless of their diagnosis.
This week is Philly Beer week (or Billy Fear week as I like to call it) and my birthday. Do you think they knew that when they planned it? I bet they did.
My name is Charisse Smith and I am a Philosophy undergrad, a non-traditional student, and married mother of three at Columbia College, and I just wanted to share an idea with you, if you have a moment.From “On Liberty” by John Stuart Mill, there are two ideas I find very moving.
And she almost put her foot down right there, because she's already had more than enough of this Lewis Carroll shit, but the trees don't seem concerned with that. Possibly because they don't know who Lewis Carroll is. They don't seem very well-read, in any case, because they murmur the same words, over and over and over until it echoes in the thrum of her heart.
Longleat, by and large, was the opposite. If anything it marked the point where it became possible to talk about alternatives to the official narrative in a meaningful sense. But to understand this we need to move over and look at Doctor Who Magazine, at this stage called Doctor Who Monthly. We talked a bit about the rise of the fan industrial complex towards the end of the Graham Williams era, but by late 1983 it was in full effect. Starting with Season Nineteen the magazine offered a thoroughly familiar and reliable structure. First it would leak scattered tidbits of information about a story in its Gallifrey Guardian column, which offered a smattering of Doctor Who news items. Then, in the last issue that would hit the stands prior to a story’s transmission, a one page preview spelling out much of the premise would be released. Finally, usually about two issues later, the magazine would run a review of the story, typically positive and never flamingly negative. Some months thereafter would come things like the end of season poll and the periodic John Nathan-Turner interview that would further cement the official “end consensus” on a story.
Her captor, John Hayden, claims it’s for her own safety. Because not all the departed are dear. Some are so unhappy with where they ended up after leaving the Underworld, they’ve come back as Furies, intent on vengeance…on the one who sent them there and on the one whom he loves.
Though this small plant hasn't put on a whole lot of new growth in the last six months, it seems to have established itself well. It's said to be deciduous, so the small needle-leaves will apparently fall off during the winter. In the meantime, we're in peak flowering season, which will last a couple of weeks. Bees, small butterflies, and tiny nectar-seeking ants seem to be loving it, and so are we.
And I wouldn’t get away without showing you a couple of shots of my husbands much beloved lawn and sprinkler system. He busted his mutton chops digging a trench to lay the pop up sprinklers. So here are some of them in action. Sprinkle that water baby!
This one is probably going to become gPa Max's b-day card because, he always said that to me my whole life. you are the apple of my eye... another basic grey button with an Hero Arts Sentiment on a
We got ourselves back out of our makeshift shelter...
and my dreams are sails that I point towards my true north,
400 BILLION? THAT’S IT?
19Consequently, you are no longer foreigners and aliens, but fellow citizens with God’s people and members of God’s household, 20built on the foundation of the apostles and prophets, with Christ Jesus himself as the chief cornerstone. 21In him the whole building is joined together and rises to become a holy temple in the Lord. 22And in him you too are being built together to become a dwelling in which God lives by his Spirit.
Occasion: Shower gifts
First and foremost, these are a NEED. I go through a pair of Uggs in no time flat. Seriously, I live in them during the months of October-March. Well worth the investment.
“Take a look at my baby, good and hard. She is Blasian. She is Jon’s baby and she is going on the Oprah trip, goddamn it!”
Slavery was very had on the black family. Many times black men with family requested to be placed on plantations down the road away from their families. It was very hard for them to watch their wife and daughters raped by the master. It was very hard for them to see their sons abused also. They would meet their families at church on Sunday. The custom of dressing up for church in the Black community spurn out of that Sunday meeting. As a slave you has no say-so of whether you would be brought or sold. This option was the only rare exception. The Master were not aware of their need to be sold. Many men tried to save up money to buy themselves out of slavery. Then they try to purchase their family. I can’t imagine what must have been like to have to buy your self to be free. The drawing above came from that research. I tried to create a sense of hopelessness and hope of Sunday Morning in the drawing.
Check the link above for basic and succinct differences between the Republican and the Democratic parties. YES! It is the civic duty of Americans of all faiths and no faith to be informed and know what the party and the person represents!
Redistribution of wealth has some role in maintaining a stable democracy and preventing starvation. But the power of wealth redistribution to produce net value is quite limited. The power of wealth creation to produce net value is extraordinary … We should be putting our resources, including our advocacy and our intellectual resources, into wealth creation as much as we can. (source)
Uttarā saw the approaching weapon first and turned, panic-stricken, to Kṛṣṇa for help. The Pāṇḍava’s instinctively reached for their own weapons, but Kṛṣṇa knew that such weapons were useless now, and there was no time for any other approach. So he took up his own weapon, the great discus of Viṣṇu which drew the perilous blast into its vortex and neutralized it. This saved the Pāṇḍavas, but an unborn child is very sensitive and easily injured. To give special protection to this child in Uttarā’s womb, Kṛṣṇa used his mystical power – which is within every atom as the soul of every soul – to form a shield around the womb and absorb the radiation from the blast.
Although his actions were directed against his own family, it was the right thing to do.
Need your Suggestion……….
Psychological Warfare Strategy development also counted on key universities dealing in Communication Sciences to develop the “mass communication” paradigm financed by the US Military, the CIA and the State Department. This led to effective propaganda used to penetrate the Iron Curtain through different means, including leaflets and broadcasting. The discipline’s field of study was wide: persuasion techniques, opinion polls, interviews, military and political mobilisations, ideological dissemination…
my parents' bedroom
Cain made the wrong choice in Genesis 4:3,5. “In the process of time it came to pass, that Cain brought of the fruit of the ground an offering unto the Lord…But unto Cain and to his offering God had not respect.” He truly believed in God and he worshipped Him. He did what he thought was right and acceptable in the Lord’s sight.
But in the end, Yauch was only 47. Just a few years older than me. Too young. Way too young. And maybe that's all I needed to know in order to feel empathy.
Crime scene: Police investigate on the night of the attack
